HURRICANE  PREPAREDNESS 

IN  THE  GRAND  STRAND 

S.  HRG.  109–1116 

FIELD  HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER 
PREVENTION AND PREDICTION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

AUGUST  10,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

64–525 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND PREDICTION 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on August 10, 2005  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Cantore, Jim, On-Air Meteorologist, The Weather Channel  ................................
Dean, Brad, President/CEO, Myrtle Beach Area Chamber of Commerce  ...........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Gandy, Jim, Chief Meteorologist, WLTX–TV, Columbia, SC  ...............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Prevatt,  David  O.,  Ph.D.,  PE,  Assistant  Professor  and  Director,  Wind  Load 
Test Facility, Department of Civil Engineering, Clemson University  .............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Whitten, Paul D., Director, Horry County Public Safety Division  ......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 

9 
3 
6 
23 
26 

12 
15 
20 
22 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

HURRICANE  PREPAREDNESS 

IN  THE  GRAND  STRAND 

WEDNESDAY,  AUGUST  10,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND PREDICTION, 
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Myrtle Beach, SC. 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:00  a.m.  at  the 
Springmaid  Beach  Resort  and  Conference  Center,  Myrtle  Beach, 
SC,  Hon.  Jim  DeMint,  Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee,  presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

SENATOR DEMINT.  Well,  I’d  like  to  call  to  order  the  first  field 
hearing  of  the  Disaster  Prevention  and  Prediction  Subcommittee. 
This  is  a  Subcommittee  that  I’m  Chairman  of.  It  was  formed  after 
the  tsunamis  but  in  recognition  that  our  country  needs  to  do  a  lot 
more  to  be  prepared  for  disasters,  whether  they  be  natural  or  oth-
erwise,  and  that  we  do  whatever  we  can  to  prevent  the  loss  of  life 
and property damage. 

So, this morning the Committee will be hearing testimony about 
the  state  of  preparedness  in  the  Grand  Strand,  and  hopefully  we 
can  get  suggestions  on  things  that  we  can  do  to  be  more  prepared 
and,  in  any  way  we  can,  to  prevent  the  loss  of  life,  economic  loss, 
and damage to property. So, I appreciate all of my witnesses being 
here today. 

You  know,  as  we  witnessed  last  year  in  Florida,  hurricanes  can 
have  a  tremendous  impact  on  life  and  property.  The  four  major 
hurricanes  that  made  landfall  were  all  among  the  top  ten  most 
costly  hurricanes  in  history  and  accounted  for  a  total  of  over  $21 
billion  in  combined  insured  losses.  And  this  is  more  than  the  in-
sured  losses  from  the  World  Trade  Center  and  the  Pentagon  at-
tacks in 2001. 

Unfortunately,  from  what  we’ve  heard  from  witnesses  before  in 
this Subcommittee, we can expect seasons like last years to be the 
norm  for  possibly  the  next  two  decades.  Just  last  month,  the  Sub-
committee heard from Max Mayfield, Director of the National Hur-
ricane  Center.  He  discussed  NOAA’s  2005  hurricane  season  pre-
diction,  which,  at  the  time,  called  for  12  to  15  tropical  storms,  of 
which 7 to 9 would become hurricanes, which would be a pretty ac-
tive season. 

Unfortunately,  as  we  all  learned  last  week,  NOAA’s  May  pre-
diction  most  likely  underestimated  the  total  number  of  tropical 
storms we’re going to see this year. Instead of the 12 to 15 storms 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

predicted in May, it’s more likely we’re going to see 18 to 21 storms 
this season, and 9 to 11 of them are going to be hurricanes. 

While  the  brunt  of  this  year’s  and  last  year’s  hurricane  season 
were  focused  on  the  Florida  and  Gulf  Coast,  we  can’t  expect  it  to 
continue indefinitely. With the forecast for an increasing number of 
hurricanes for the next two decades, we can expect that, sometime 
in  the  near  future,  we  will  see  a  major  hurricane  make  landfall  in 
or  near  the  Grand  Strand.  The  state  and  local  governments  have 
been  working  hard  to  prepare  for  the  possibility  of  a  major  hurri-
cane making landfall here. 

I  hope  those  of  you  who  are  here  from  out  of  town  took  note  of 
the blue and white evacuation signs. I know the locals know which 
arteries they need to take to get out of town in the event of a major 
storm making landfall here in the Grand Strand. 

I  know  that  the  state  and  local  governments  appreciate  the 
threat posed by these storms and are doing all they can to prepare 
for the storms. But a lot of the preparation falls to citizens. 

Everyone  should  have  a  family  hurricane  disaster  plan  that 
stocks the necessary supplies in the event that you have to shelter 
in  place  during  a  storm  or  if  you  lose  power.  Homeowners  and 
builders should consider using disaster-resistant building materials 
that  will  help  protect  their  homes  from  the  rain  associated  with 
hurricanes.  If  a  homeowner  can  keep  the  rain  out  of  their  house 
during a storm, the damage would be much less severe. 

If the Federal Government, the state and local governments, and, 
most importantly, local citizens work together, we can dramatically 
reduce the damage caused by these storms. 

This  morning,  we’re  going  to  hear  from  a  number  of  witnesses 
who  will  help  provide  insights  into  how  we  can  better  prepare  our 
communities.  I’m  looking  forward  to  the  comments  of  Jim  Gandy, 
South  Carolina’s  weatherman,  on  how  our  local  communities  can 
better  prepare  for  storms  that  will  impact  our  communities  in  the 
coming  years.  He  has  advised  governors  on  preparing  for  storms, 
and I’m looking forward to his insights. 

Also  appearing  this  morning  will  be  Dr.  David  Prevatt,  from 
Clemson’s Wind Load Test Facility, to discuss how the winds asso-
ciated with hurricanes impact structures. Clemson’s work to model 
the  impact  of  severe  storms  provides  important  discoveries  into 
how  we  can  better  construct  our  buildings  to  resist  severe  storms. 
Living  in  a  coastal  community  exposed  to  hurricanes,  I’m  sure 
many  of  you  have  watched  The  Weather  Channel’s  Storm  Stories 
or have seen the on-air meteorologist, Jim Cantore, report from the 
field. I appreciate him being here this morning. He has been in the 
eye  of  many  storms,  and  I  know  he’s  going  to  have  important  per-
spectives on what these communities—what our communities could 
do to better prepare. 

Also  appearing  this  morning  will  be  Paul  Whitten,  the  Public 
Safety  Director  for  Horry  County.  Mr.  Whitten  is  responsible  for 
planning and preparation that ensures that, when a storm does im-
pact  the  Grand  Strand,  that  the  community  is  prepared.  I  will  be 
interested to hear how he works with the various governments and 
community groups to ensure that Myrtle Beach is prepared for one 
of these storms. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

Finally,  we’ll  be  hearing  from  Mr.  Brad  Dean,  President  of  the 
Myrtle Beach Chamber of Commerce. The economy of Myrtle Beach 
depends,  to  a  large  degree,  on  the  vitality  of  the  tourism  industry, 
which  is  directly  impacted  by  local  and  regional  weather,  particu-
larly the threat of hurricanes. Mr. Dean will be discussing local in-
dustry’s  preparation  for  hurricanes  and  the  impact  that  those 
storms have on local businesses. 

In  the  past,  we’ve  seen  periods  where  hurricane  activity  was  as 
high  as  it  is  now,  but  development  was  not  nearly  as  dense  in  our 
coastal communities as it is today. Tourism and coastal businesses 
are  an  essential  part  of  the  Grand  Strand  and  South  Carolina’s 
economy.  We  must  work  today  to  ensure  that  we  are  prepared  for 
a storm when it hits and that we can recover quickly and get back 
to business as soon as possible. 

While  these  storms  are  dramatic  events  when  they  make  land-
fall,  they  are  relatively  rare  events.  Day  in  and  day  out,  visitors 
should  enjoy  the  beautiful  beaches  we  have  here  in  Myrtle  Beach 
and enjoy all that South Carolina has to offer. 

With  that,  I’ll  ask  our  witnesses  to  make  their  opening  state-
ments.  And  if  you  could  confine  your  statements  to  five  minutes, 
I’d  appreciate  it.  If  you’ve  got  a  longer  statement,  we  will  make  it 
part of the official record. 

And that is, I think, an important note. The purpose of this Com-
mittee is to collect official information that we can submit to all the 
Committee  staff  who  are  developing  legislation.  It  gives  us,  cer-
tainly, the information we need to convince other Senators to follow 
our lead on whatever needs to be done from developing new legisla-
tion.  So,  this  is  part  of  the  official  record,  and  it’s  an  official  hear-
ing, and I appreciate all of you taking part in it. 

Why don’t we start with Mr. Dean? And we will take statements 
from  everyone.  I’ll  ask  some  questions,  and  then,  I  mentioned  to 
some of the panelists, if you have questions of others or comments 
that you’d like to make in addition to what someone else has said, 
we  want  to  get  all  the  information  we  can  before  we  leave  today. 

So, Mr. Dean, if you’ll start us off, I’d appreciate it. 

STATEMENT OF BRAD DEAN, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

MYRTLE BEACH AREA CHAMBER OF COMMERCE 

Mr.  DEAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  let  me,  if  you’ll  in-
dulge me, begin with my professional obligation, as President of the 
Chamber,  welcoming  you  and  all  the  panelists  and  visitors  here 
today to the Grand Strand. We certainly are delighted to see them. 
And  it’s  one  of  the  few  times  where  we  are  excited  and  pleased  to 
see  Jim  Cantore  arrive.  Normally  when  Mr.  Cantore  arrives,  it  is 
not with good news, so we’re welcoming him, as well, today. Thank 
you all for being here. 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  know  and  indicated  in  your  opening  com-
ments, travel and tourism is one of the Nation’s largest industries, 
certainly  the  largest  industry  in  South  Carolina.  Whether  you 
measure  that  by  retail  sales,  employment,  or  economic  outlook,  it 
is  certainly  an  important  industry  for  the  Southeastern  United 
States and the United States in general. 

Here in South Carolina, tourism is big business. It’s a $15 billion 
industry. And the Grand Strand, the area from Little River, North 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

Carolina,  to  Georgetown,  is  one-third  of  the  State’s  tourism  econ-
omy.  Though  it  is  an  industry  made  up  of  small  businesses,  it  is 
truly  big  business  in  South  Carolina.  And  the  economic  impact  ex-
tends far beyond the coastline. Tourism pays for bridges, for roads, 
for economic development; it even pays for schools. So, what’s good 
for  tourism  is  good  for  South  Carolina.  And,  certainly,  what’s  good 
for tourism is good for America. 

There  has  been  much  debate  within  the  tourism  industry  and 
outside  the  tourism  industry  on  the  recent  release  of  the  five-day 
forecast.  The  five-day  forecast,  because  of  its  inherent  inaccuracy, 
especially  in  light  of  the  very  accurate  three-day  forecast,  caused 
much concern. And I can tell you from the perspective of the Myrtle 
Beach  Area  Chamber,  where  we  handle  hundreds  of  thousands  of 
phone calls from prospective visitors each year, just the mention of 
a  tropical  storm  that  could  make  its  way  to  the  Eastern  United 
States will start the phones ringing. And the minute that the Caro-
linas  or  Myrtle  Beach,  in  specific,  is  mentioned  as  part  of  that  po-
tential  five-day  forecast  track,  it  is  not  at  all  uncommon  to  receive 
hundreds  of  calls  each  hour,  with  visitors  not  sure  if  they  should 
come. That has clearly been a trend that we have seen, and it has 
not  changed.  If  anything,  that  has  grown  in  the  sensitivity—some 
might  call,  the  panic—associated  with  potential  five-day  forecasts 
causes many potential visitors to call and express concern and per-
haps change vacation patterns. 

Bear  in  mind  that  a  big  day  in  tourism  along  the  Grand  Strand 
is $40 million a day. And that doesn’t count the millions of dollars 
of state and local taxes. So, the slightest change in forecasting can 
very  well  cause  millions  of  dollars  of  economic  impact.  Although  I 
would  go  so  far  as  to  say,  Mr.  Chairman—and  I  think  I  speak  for 
the  entire  tourism  industry  when  I  say  that  the  issue  here  today 
is  not  economics.  Certainly,  the  most  important  factor  that  we  all 
must consider, and I think would all agree, is safety—safety of visi-
tors, safety of residents—and securing the safety and well-being of 
those  who  are  here,  and  planning  to  arrive  here.  So,  the  ultimate 
discussion  is  not  about  the  economic  impact,  but  what  we  do  to 
minimize that, as well as to maximize the safety and well-being of 
our residents and visitors. 

We find that the accuracy of forecasting with the three-day fore-
cast  has  enabled  our  local  emergency  planners—most  notably,  Mr. 
Whitten  and  those  who  work  with  him,  as  well  as  the  American 
Red  Cross  and  other  local  agencies,  as  well  as  businesses—suffi-
cient  time  to  plan  for  and  handle  storms  that  may  be  approaching 
the coastline and could eventually fall here. But we don’t, certainly, 
want to rely on what has worked in the past. 

We  understand—let  me  be  very  clear—we  understand  that  the 
five-day  forecast  is  here  to  stay.  One  of  our  chief  goals  is  to  work 
with NOAA, the National Weather Service, the community of mete-
orologists, as well as emergency planners, to ensure that, if we are 
to  use  a  five-day  forecast,  it  should  be  as  accurate  as  possible.  We 
believe that an accurate five-day forecast will not only enhance the 
safety and well-being of our residents and visitors, it could also en-
hance tourism, because tourism, in some respects, lives and dies off 
of  weather,  good  or  bad.  But  we  believe  that  the  five-day  forecast 
will be far more useful when its accuracy is improved. And, though 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

I certainly recognize that it is improving, and has improved in the 
recent years it has been used, we would hope to see the day, some-
time  soon,  when  the  five-day  forecast  is  every  bit  as  useful  as  a 
three-day forecast in projecting exactly where landfall may be. 

Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  also  echo  your  comments  and  say  that  I 
certainly agree with you, when we look at the pace of development. 
We have heard that hurricanes are likely to be more frequent along 
the  coast  of  South  Carolina,  and  particularly  the  Eastern  United 
States.  One  other  trend  that  is  clear  and  not  going  to  change  any-
time  soon,  and  one  that  we  welcome,  is  the  growth  of  visitors  and 
residents  along  the  coast  of  South  Carolina.  This  is  a  high-growth 
area.  One  doesn’t  have  to  travel  too  far  from  where  we’re  sitting 
today  to  see  development  that  is  geared  toward  that  projected 
growth. 

So,  with  more  people  coming  to  the  coast,  and  more  storms  ex-
pected, your point is very well taken, and I applaud you, your Sub-
committee  Members,  as  well  as  Chairman  Stevens  and  Senator 
Inouye,  for  hosting  such  hearings  to  address  what  we  need  to  do 
in the future to maximize safety and minimize the economic impact 
of this. 

There are a lot of suggestions that can be made, and we will hear 
some  of  those  today.  But  we  do  believe  that  a  proactive  approach 
to development to prepare for the eventual storm that we have not 
seen  in  any  recent  year  that  would  make  landfall  here,  as  well  as 
striving to improve the accuracy of the forecasting models, will ben-
efit all—residents, businesses, and government. 

We  believe  that,  here  along  the  coast,  and  particularly  in  Horry 
County, we have demonstrated a model that has worked extremely 
well,  with  a  close,  ongoing,  collaborative  partnership  between  local 
government,  state  government,  businesses,  as  well  as  public  and 
private agencies, who work seamlessly to plan for, prepare for, and, 
ultimately, handle storms and the after-effect of storms. 

I would note that the economic cost of a hurricane starts long be-
fore  it  would  ever  make  landfall  and  lasts  sometimes  weeks  or 
months  after  it  has  made  landfall.  But  we  cannot  simply  look  for 
the days before and after the storm, but, rather, to be prepared for 
and  handle  all  such  effects  that  we  would  see  with  a  large  storm 
approaching the coast of South Carolina. 

Again,  let  me  reiterate  that  safety  certainly  should  be  our  top 
concern. And none of us, particularly those of us in the tourism in-
dustry, would ever suggest that anything other than safety is most 
important.  But  we  certainly  strive  to  balance  that  with  the  eco-
nomic  impact  that  a  storm  could  have,  even  if  it’s  only  projected 
along  the  coast.  When  it  comes  to  this,  I  assure  you,  the  tourism 
industry will someday be the biggest proponent of the five-day fore-
cast  that’ll  let  us  put  behind  us,  perhaps,  past  disagreements  over 
forecasting models and simply strive together to work to make sure 
that  those  which  are  used  and  publicized  are  as  accurate  as  pos-
sible. 

Again,  I  want  to  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  your  Sub-
committee, for hosting this hearing along the Grand Strand. I also 
want to take the opportunity to thank those at NOAA, the National 
Weather  Service,  and  the  community  of  meteorologists.  They  prob-
ably feel, sometimes, that the tourism industry does not appreciate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

the  work  they  do.  We  do,  in  fact.  What  they  do  is  very  important 
work,  and  it  is  essential  to  the  safety  and  well-being,  not  only  of 
our  visitors  and  residents,  but  of  our  tourism  economy.  We  believe 
that  when  we  continue  the  collaborative  effort,  ongoing  discussion, 
thorough analysis, and the involvement of individuals like those on 
this  panel  today,  that  we  will  find  solutions  to  enhance  the  poten-
tial  effectiveness  of  our  preparation  and  prepare  for  those  days 
when storms do arrive here, even with more residents and visitors 
along the Grand Strand. 

Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  welcome  to  the  Grand  Strand,  and  thank 

you for your time today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Dean follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BRAD DEAN, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

MYRTLE BEACH AREA CHAMBER OF COMMERCE 

Summary 

Tourism  is  a  major  industry  along  the  Grand  Strand  and  in  South  Carolina.  The 
state’s  tourism  industry  accounts  for  $15  billion  of  economic  impact,  in  addition  to 
over  $1  billion  in  state  and  local  taxes.  The  Grand  Strand  accounts  for  nearly  one- 
third  that  amount.  Grand  Strand  tourism  peaks  in  the  summer,  with  as  many  as 
500,000 daily visitors spending in excess of $40 million. 

The  use  of  the  five-day  hurricane  forecast  has  a  negative  impact  on  tourism,  as 
it  projects  possible  strikes  with  a  broad  ‘‘cone  of  uncertainty’’  that  spans  hundreds 
of  miles.  The  result  of  the  five-day  forecast  is  two-fold:  it  unnecessarily  projects  a 
path  that  is  far  from  certain,  potentially  scaring  tourists  away;  and  it  can  lead  to 
such  consistently  inaccurate  results  that  residents  and  visitors  accumulate  a  false 
sense  of  security  through  experience  based  upon  the  consistent  inaccuracy  of  the 
five-day forecast. 

The  five-day  forecast  was  implemented  with  little  or  no  input  from  the  tourism 
industry, but it appears this forecast is here to stay. Ultimately, the solution is not 
eliminating  the  five-day  forecast  but,  rather,  improving  it.  If  the  five-day  forecast 
were as accurate as the three-day forecast is today, the tourism industry would wel-
come  its  use.  The  best  possible  solution  is  improved  weather  forecasting,  yielding 
a five-day forecast with a high level of accuracy. 

Because  we  are  so  significantly  impacted  by  weather  and  weather  patterns,  a 
weather  forecast  is  a  key  part  of  our  local  tourism  trends.  Some  estimates  indicate 
that as much as 40 percent of our visitor base during any week during the summer 
is  dependent  on  the  immediate  weather  forecast.  This  is  not  surprising  when  one 
considers  that  44  percent  of  the  annual  visitor  traffic  to  the  Myrtle  Beach  area 
comes from North and South Carolina. 

A  few  years  ago,  when  we  first  learned  of  the  proposed  five-day  hurricane  fore-
cast, many Grand Strand residents and businesses became concerned. Knowing that 
the  three-day  forecast  was  far  from  perfect,  we  were  justifiably  concerned  with  the 
planned  use  of  the  five-day  forecast.  How  could  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmos-
pheric  Administration  (NOAA),  a  division  of  the  Department  of  Commerce,  expect 
to implement this with little or no input from the tourism industry, the very indus-
try  that  stands  to  gain  the  most  from  accurate  weather  reporting  and,  likewise, 
stands to lose the most with inaccurate weather forecasting. After all, NOAA’s mis-
sion  statement  (see  Exhibit  A)  includes  mention  of  ‘‘improve  economic  efficiency  by 
providing the best watches, warnings and forecasts.’’ We were told this change was 
necessary for the United States Navy to protect its large fleet off the coast of Florida 
and,  furthermore,  that  emergency  planners  along  the  coastal  regions  of  the  United 
States preferred the five-day forecast. I think I can safely speak for the tourism in-
dustry  when  I  say  that  we  had  no  concerns,  then  or  now,  with  the  use  of  the  five- 
day  forecast  by  the  U.S.  Navy  nor  emergency  planners.  After  all,  both  must  plan 
in advance far before individual citizens need to do so. 

What  was  most  concerning  was  the  large  margin  of  error  incumbent  in  the  five- 
day  forecast.  By  their  own  admission,  meteorologists  with  NOAA  and  the  National 
Weather  Service  described  the  massive  area  of  strike  probability  a  ‘‘cone  of  uncer-
tainty.’’ This area, which can encompass hundreds of square miles, is accurately re-
ferred  to  as  such,  since  the  use  of  this  five-day  forecast  has  revealed  a  high  degree 
of inaccuracy (see Exhibit B). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

I  have  enclosed  a  document,  obtained  from  the  NOAA  website,  which  shows  a 
graphic  representation  of  the  average  accuracy  of  various  hurricane  forecasts  over 
a 10-year period. Two observations are clear and indisputable: 

(a) the three-day forecast is far more accurate today than ever before; 
(b)  the  five-day  forecast  is  far  less  accurate  and  not  nearly  as  reliable  as  the 
three-day forecast. 

Recent  examples  of  these  observations  have  been  witnessed  by  many.  Hurricane 
Charley,  a  serious  storm  that  caused  much  damage  in  the  Southeastern  United 
States,  made  landfall  near  Punta  Gorda,  FL,  despite  a  forecast  track  that  pointed 
toward Tampa Bay, FL, an area nearly 100 miles north of the actual landfall. Early 
forecasts  of  Tropical  Storm  Bonnie  showed  forecasted  paths  of  southern  Florida, 
then  later  Texas  and  Louisiana,  before  the  storm  followed  an  awkward  path  in  the 
Gulf of Mexico and ultimately made landfall along the Florida panhandle. 

Proponents  of  a  five-day  hurricane  forecast  will  no  doubt  point  out  that  the  five- 
day  forecast  in  both  of  the  storm  situations  mentioned  above  included  a  wide  area, 
wide  enough  to  encompass  geographic  areas  that  needed  to  prepare  for  such  a 
storm. But this inherent inaccuracy is the very root of the problem. 

Once  the  national  media  have  publicized  the  five-day  forecast,  areas  with  little 
probability of serious storm threats will necessarily be included in the five-day fore-
cast  ‘‘cone  of  uncertainty.’’  It  is  not  uncommon  for  more  than  one  state  to  be  in-
cluded. At the Myrtle Beach Area Chamber of Commerce, it is quite common to re-
ceive many phone calls from distressed visitors seeking to change or cancel their va-
cation plans once the first mention of the Myrtle Beach area or even ‘‘the Carolinas’’ 
is made with respect to a possible hurricane path. 

If only the visitors from states other than North and South Carolina unnecessarily 
change  their  vacation  plans  to  the  coast  of  South  Carolina  due  to  a  hurricane,  the 
economic  costs  can  be  in  excess  of  $25  million  per  day.  Please  bear  in  mind,  this 
refers to one single vacation destination in one single state. 

But, the ultimate cost is not economic but, rather, in human life and safety. With 
so much inherent inaccuracy in the five-day forecast, meteorologists are transformed 
into a modern-day, high-tech version of ‘‘Chicken Little,’’ unintentionally announcing 
the  sky  may  be  falling.  This  is  through  no  fault  of  their  own  but,  rather,  through 
the customary use of the five-day forecast published by NOAA. Though some mete-
orologists  have  spoken  out  publicly  against  the  use  of  the  five-day  forecast,  its  use 
continues. 

Proponents  of  this  forecast  argue  for  its  publication,  essentially  noting  that  ‘‘any 
information  is  better  than  no  information.’’  They  rightfully  note  that  the  potential 
safety  and  protection  of  life  and  property  justifies  the  use  of  the  five-day  forecast. 
These  arguments  may  seem  logical  at  first  but  ignore  the  damage  that  a  consist-
ently  inaccurate  hurricane  forecast  can  cause.  A  forecast  that  is  more  likely  to  be 
wrong  than  right  may  only  serve  to  prompt  residents  and  visitors  to  ignore  such 
a forecast, or worse yet, to believe that weather forecasting in general is inaccurate. 
This is despite a very accurate three-day forecast which has proven to be a reliable 
tool  that  allows  public  safety  personnel  more  than  enough  time  to  evacuate  the 
Grand  Strand  which,  when  at  its  peak,  is  one  of  the  busiest  vacation  destinations 
in the entire Nation. And that is done despite this area being the Nation’s most pop-
ular vacation destination with no direct access to an Interstate, yet with 93 percent 
of  our  visitors  driving  here.  Despite  large  numbers  of  visitors  in  automobiles  and 
insufficient  infrastructure  for  visitors  to  leave  the  area,  the  three-day  forecast  has 
proven more than sufficient to manage the safety of our visitors and residents. 

With  an  amazingly  high  level  of  accuracy  in  the  three-day  forecast,  and  a  dis-
appointing level of inaccuracy in the five-day forecast, it is easy to understand why 
many in the tourism industry were surprised and somewhat disappointed when the 
five-day  forecast  became  a  common  forecasting  tool.  Nevertheless,  this  genie  is  out 
of the bottle and not likely to return. 

So,  it  is  appropriate  for  us  to  work  together,  in  a  collaborative  manner,  to  seek 
the  best  possible  outcome,  and  that  is  an  outcome  that  all  involved  in  this  discus-
sion  can  agree  to:  the  clear,  indisputable  need  for  improved  weather  forecasting. 
Those of us in the tourism industry who have been the staunchest opponents of the 
five-day  forecast  would  become,  perhaps,  its  biggest  proponents  if  the  level  of  accu-
racy  were  increased  to  a  level  similar  to  that  of  the  three-day  forecast.  Improved 
forecasting would be far less likely to unnecessarily harm a coastal tourism economy 
in  any  state.  Further,  an  accurate  five-day  forecast  would  be  more  reliable  in  the 
eyes  of  individual  citizens  whose  safety  must  come  first,  before  any  economic  loss 
or promise of economic gain. 

I am reminded of the old saying that ‘‘change is not always better, but to be bet-
ter,  one  must  be  willing  to  change.’’  Clearly,  the  five-day  forecast  has  not  proven 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

to be a better forecasting tool, even by the admission of those who use it regularly. 
Some  meteorologists  have  even  spoken  out  against  the  use  of  the  five-day  forecast, 
noting  their  clear  preference  for  an  accurate  three-day  forecast.  Furthermore,  this 
change has caused unnecessary concern and economic loss since its implementation. 
For  the  benefit  of  all,  including  the  safety  of  our  residents  and  our  visitors,  im-
proved  weather  forecasting  that  increases  the  accuracy  of  the  five-day  hurricane 
forecast  will  be  better  for  all  involved,  ultimately  enhancing  the  safety  of  our  citi-
zens and the vibrancy of our national tourism economy. 

EXHIBIT A 

EXHIBIT B 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
A
A
O
N
0
1
8

s
p
e
.

1
A
A
O
N
0
1
8

9 

Senator  DEMINT.  Mr.  Cantore,  I  think  this  is  the  first  time  I’ve 
ever seen you when you weren’t standing in 50- to 80-mile-an-hour 
wind. So, it’s—— 

Mr. CANTORE. Well, Mr. Chairman—— 
Senator DEMINT.—it’s good to have you with us today. 
Mr. CANTORE.—I’ve got to tell you, it’s a nice break, to be honest 
with you. And Mr. Dean, I’m sure, agrees with me, that you’d rath-
er see me in a suit and tie, too. No question about it. 

STATEMENT OF JIM CANTORE, ON-AIR METEOROLOGIST, 

THE WEATHER CHANNEL 

Mr.  CANTORE.  But  I  thank  you  for  having  me.  And,  you  know, 
I’ve  been  doing  this  for  about  13  years.  And  I  just  want  to  share 
with  you  some  of  the  things  that  I’ve  seen  over  the  past,  maybe 
some things we can improve on. 

This  does  not  cover  any  post-hurricane  issues,  obviously,  which 
I  would  suggest  be  discussed,  as  well,  because  I  think  getting  peo-
ple  back  in,  is  perhaps  just  as  important  as  getting  them  out  of 
harm’s way, as well. 

All right, let’s talk about some hurricane facts that I just wanted 
to share with you. To this day, there is no way to accurately predict 
any  tropical  intensification  fluctuations.  In  other  words,  let’s  just 
take Irene, that’s out there now. That was supposed to be a hurri-
cane by now. It is not. It’s barely hanging on as a depression. And, 
as  a  result  of  that,  the  steering  is  influenced  heavily  by  the  size 
of the storm. So, this is something that, until we get better science 
in this area, you’ve got to realize that we’re dealing with an animal 
that’s going to change on us, in where it’s going. 

We  are  in,  as  you  mentioned,  Senator,  an  above-average  phase 
of  hurricane  development,  because,  if  you  will,  this  multi-decadal 
phase—if  you  go  back  into  the  1960s  and  1970s,  we  had  above-av-
erage  years  then—starting  back  in  1995,  we  have  had  above-aver-
age  years  of  hurricanes.  There’s  no  reason  to  expect  that  to  weak-
en. We expect the current trend to continue, as you mentioned. 

Inland  flooding  is  the  number-one  killer  in  land-falling  tropical 
systems.  So,  as  we  prepare  to  get  people  off  the  coast,  we  have  to 
also  keep  them  out  of  harm’s  way  in  where  we  think  that  rainfall 
may be heaviest inland, as well. 

And  a  strengthening  and  accelerating  land-falling  hurricane 
could  be  a  nightmare.  Charley—out  of  all  of  the  four  last  year  in 
Florida,  Charley  was  the  only  one  that  was  accelerating  and  deep-
ening  upon  landfall.  And  the  people  that  I  talked  to  in  Orlando, 
and  the  people  that  I  talked  to  in  Daytona,  remember  Charley 
more  than  they  remember  Frances  and  Jeanne,  which  came  in  on 
their  side  of  the  coast,  as  far  as  damage  is  concerned.  So,  that’s  a 
nightmare. And people, believe it or not, still believe that they can’t 
have  anything  like  that  happen  to  them.  Nobody’s  going  to  argue 
there. 

You know, we cannot discuss evacuation without enlightening ev-
eryone  to  the  tremendous  psychological  impact  that  occurs  within 
people  as  they  prepare  for  an  evacuation,  what  it  is  we’re  asking 
of them, to leave the comfort of their dwelling and, in many cases, 
everything they have worked for, while seeing images of past hurri-
canes  wreak  havoc  on  the  coastline.  Not  knowing  when  they  can 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

come  back  to  life  as  they  know  it,  many  in  Florida  have  not  done 
that, and may never do that. And we’re asking them to sit in traffic 
for  hours  while  a  storm  may  or  may  not  be  worthy  of  leaving  in 
the  first  place.  Having  to  deal  with  the  enormous  psychological 
stress of evacuation, not to mention what they could find in return. 
So,  what  do  we  want  to  do?  We  want  to  tell  people  to  get  out  of 
harm’s  way  and  reduce  the  stresses  of  getting  out  of  harm’s  way, 
because  we  know  they’re  already  heavily  stressed,  just  the  emo-
tional,  you  know—the  impacts  from  what  they  see  on  TV,  what 
they hear on radio, and whatnot. 

Here’s  what’s  good  that  I  see  out  there.  Enhanced  technologies 
have  created  greater  awareness.  Satellites  are  better.  Radars  are 
better.  Cell  phones  and  high-speed  Internet  gets  everybody  access 
to  the  information  that  we  use  on  The  Weather  Channel.  People 
know  it’s  coming.  Our  problem  is  not  making  people  aware  of  the 
fact that it’s coming. Everybody knows that it’s coming. 

The EOC, the Emergency Operations Center meetings seem very 
timely when I’m on the coastline. They’re already meeting, in many 
cases,  and  planning  meetings.  And  we  know  when  those  meetings 
are.  And  the  public  information  officers,  the  PIOs,  who  basically 
represent  what  is  coming  out  of  the  EOC,  make  themselves  very 
available to the media. The last two hurricanes, in Emily and Den-
nis, I covered, I actually had them call me on my cell phone. They 
were very willing to do so. So, we appreciate that. 

And the coast has experience. We’ve been in above-average hurri-
cane seasons now since 1995, and with video and certainly all these 
emergency  operation  procedures  that  have  been  in  place,  and  con-
tinue  to  be  in  place  and  improved  upon,  you  know,  it’s  just  a  mat-
ter of getting it done. 

The  bad  and  the  ugly.  We  run  out  of  gas.  We’re  asking  people 
to  leave,  and  then  we  don’t  have  the  necessities  in  place  to  get 
them  out  of  harm’s  way.  That  is  what  I  call  a  ‘‘disaster  in  a  dis-
aster.’’ 

Plywood, generators, gas cans always seem to be in short supply. 
I  wonder  why  hardware  stores  can’t  just  be  on  standby  with  extra 
supplies  that  are  needed  for  hurricane  preparedness,  and  bring 
those in, even if they have to sell them right off the truck, because 
now  we’ve  postponed  preparedness  with  people.  And,  to  anybody 
who’s  ever  tried  to  put  up  a  piece  of  plywood  in  30-mile-an-hour 
wind, it’s very hard and it’s very difficult. 

People still have to sit in traffic for hours when evacuating. This 
is the big one. This is the thing that I think needs to be addressed 
the most. Shelter information—where, when they open, et cetera— 
often  arrives  late.  If  it  wasn’t  for  my  friends  at  the  Red  Cross,  I 
would have a hard time getting that information. It’s often the last 
thing to get to us, ‘‘Oh, and by the way, here are the shelters.’’ 

Media coverage has tripled in the last ten years. So, what we do 
there  is  risk  a  mixed  message.  The  more  media  out  there  covering 
it, I think you risk a mixed message. 

My  recommendations—all  EOC  communications  must  be  strong 
within EOC and to all media outlets. I look at this like me and my 
wife. We tell our kids to do something, and we agree upon it, usu-
ally it gets done. If there’s disagreement with us, and that message 
is  sent  to  them,  then  it  doesn’t  get  done.  So,  we  almost  have  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

have  a  strong  family  unit  within  the  EOC  in  the  communications 
that they send out to all the media. 

As  far  as  evacuation  orders,  when  they  are  given,  there  has  to 
be  some  way  to  get  those  people  out  on  all  lanes  of  highways  and 
Interstates.  I  know  this  is  a  tremendous  undertaking,  and  maybe 
even impossible in some areas. But if we ask someone to sit in traf-
fic  for  eight  hours  to  go  ten  miles,  like  we  did  in  Florida,  they’re 
not  going  to  leave  again,  regardless  of  the  strength  of  the  hurri-
cane.  So,  evacuations  and  getting  the  routes  open  to  get  them  out 
is very, very critical. 

Like  I  said,  PIOs  need  to  be  accurate,  complete,  and  effective 
communicators.  I’ve  seen  that  a  lot  lately.  When  they  come  out, 
they’re  pretty  much  the  word  of  the  EOC,  and  they’re  very  willing 
to talk to us, which is great, and we appreciate that. 

I mentioned earlier, we can’t have a ‘‘disaster within a disaster.’’ 
We  evacuated  the  whole  East  Coast  during  Hurricane  Floyd,  and 
a  lot  of  people  sat  in  traffic  for  hours  and  hours  and  hours,  and 
they didn’t even have to leave at all. So, a lot of unnecessary evacu-
ation  there.  And  what  I  call,‘‘  Gas  Mania  2004,’’  when  the  ports  of 
Florida  were  closed  down  too  early  and  people  couldn’t  get  gas, 
what  that  caused  people  to  do,  even  this  year  during  Hurricane 
Dennis,  is  to  go  buy  five  and  ten  gas  cans,  fill  all  those  up,  and 
we ran out of gas again. So, we can’t run out of gas if we’re asking 
people to leave. 

And  all  the  media,  regardless  of  how  much  we  have  out  there, 
need to have a succinct and consistent message. More media means 
we  risk  that.  And  people  need  to  know  as  soon  as  possible  when 
they  can  or  cannot  return.  Some  of  the  hardest  stresses  on  you,  I 
think,  are  not  knowing  when  you  can  come  back  to  whatever  you 
have left. It’s kind of like if you go to the doctor’s and you’re wait-
ing  to  hear  on  a  test,  a  certain  test—the  longer  that  takes,  the 
more  stress  builds  up.  So,  any  information,  in  the  meantime,  of 
when  people  can  come  back,  even  if  it’s  a  month,  two  months,  an 
estimate, I think, is better than not saying anything at all. 

So, I conclude with this. There has never been a perfect forecast, 
to the best of my knowledge. State-of-the-art technology gives us a 
better lead time to prepare for natural disasters. Strong support for 
these  advances  is  essential.  So,  technology  needs  to  be  continually 
improved upon. 

And if we effectively communicate our message and we have the 
necessities  in  place  for  a  stressed  community  to  process,  prepare, 
and  protect  themselves  and  their  families,  I  would  like  to  see  the 
day—and  I  do  see  the  day—that  hurricane  evacuation  goes  as 
smooth as a fire drill. 

Thank you. 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
Mr. Prevatt. Dr. Prevatt. Sorry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

STATEMENT OF DAVID PREVATT, PH.D., PE, 

ASSISTANT PROFESSOR AND DIRECTOR, 

WIND LOAD TEST FACILITY, DEPARTMENT OF 
CIVIL ENGINEERING, CLEMSON UNIVERSITY 

Dr.  PREVATT.  Well,  gentlemen,  thank  you.  My  name  is  David 
Prevatt.  I  am  an  Assistant  Professor  of  Civil  Engineering  at 
Clemson  University,  and  Director  of  the  Wind  Load  Test  Facility. 
I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Subcommittee 
and to testify. 

I  must  admit  that  I  come  here  as  an  advocate,  on  behalf  of  the 
researchers and of this community, for an increase in Federal sup-
port for science and technology research to develop hurricane miti-
gation  and  risk-assessment  measures.  Hurricanes,  as  we  have 
heard,  are  large,  costly  natural  disasters  that  cost  billions  to  re-
cover  from  and,  let’s  not  forget,  causing  misery  and  suffering  to 
millions of people. 

The  fact  is,  about  50  percent  of  the  U.S.  population  now  lives  in 
a  hurricane-prone  coastal  area,  yet  Federal  support  for  hurricane 
research  only  amounts  to  about  $5  to  $10  million  per  year.  In  all, 
over the 20th century, a mere $50 million has been directed to hur-
ricane research. 

On  this,  we  have,  from  Hurricane  Hugo  in  1989,  Fran,  Bonnie, 
of  course,  Floyd,  that  Jim  talked  about,  and  the  2004  hurricanes. 
These are figures from the EMD—South Carolina’s EMD—$1.6 bil-
lion in damage to our state, alone. Now, this money is not counting 
the insurance payouts, costs of agricultural damage, small-business 
association  loans,  and  unrealized  taxes  and  business  losses,  not  to 
mention  the  other  indirect  losses  that  we  probably  can’t  account 
for. 

So,  despite  this  painfully  slow  lack  of  funds,  we  have  made 
progress  in  South  Carolina  and  in  the  states.  Research  has  led  to 
the  creation  and  adoption  of  the  latest  IBC  2000  building  code  by 
South Carolina and other states. This code contains provisions that 
significantly increase the chance of survival of buildings. 

The  knowledge—part  of  our  research  at  Clemson  University  has 
been  the  instrumentation  of  houses  along  the  coast  of  Florida, 
North  Carolina,  and  South  Carolina.  What  we  do  here  is  set  up 
portable  wind  towers  to  monitor  the  wind  speeds,  and  we  also  in-
stall  sensors  on  houses  to  measure  the  wind  pressures  on  those 
houses. 

What we have found is this. Lots of—a small bit of asphalt shin-
gles  and  sheathing,  like  this,  results  in  some  degree  of  damage  to 
your  roofing  system,  without  any  structural  damage.  And,  finally, 
this  can  result  in  complete,  almost  total,  destruction  of  your  inte-
rior  contents,  failed  wall  systems,  and  costs  resulting  in  about  80 
percent of your insured value. 

So,  one  of  the  problems  that  I  see  is  that  we  look  for,  no  longer, 
just the structural problems, but there are other building envelope 
problems that are required to be fixed. 

The  knowledge  is  available  now  to  design  and  construct  struc-
tures  to  resist  100  percent  of  the  hurricanes,  100  percent  of  the 
time. However, no one wants to pay for that, and no one, probably, 
would want to live in that kind of building. So, what is needed for 
us  is  to  use  the  knowledge  to  continue  our  code  development  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

study policy implications that can result in solutions that the com-
munity—that the Grand Strand is willing to pay for. 

Here is one of the houses that we have instrumented. Part of the 
techniques we are doing is comparing—if you look at the right-most 
corner  of  the  picture,  you’ll  see  three  metal  sensors.  Those  dupli-
cate the wind pressures. 

Next slide, please? 
We’ve done models of that house, and in—we can use those mod-
els  to  put  it  in  the  Wind  Load  Test  Facility’s  wind  tunnel,  and, 
therefore,  compare  full-scale  and  model-scale  data.  This  is  giving 
us,  for  the  first  time,  knowledge  about  how  buildings  in  suburban 
areas  are  loaded  by  the  wind,  and,  therefore,  we  are  going  to  be 
able to improve our designs and perhaps not have to be as conserv-
ative, sometimes, in our code development. 

Simple  low-cost  measures  that  homeowners  can  do  to  improve 

their houses are provided in my written testimony. 

I  see  three  urgent  problems  that  we  need  to  resolve.  And  this 
would  only  be  solved  through  collaboration  with  researchers  and 
the Chambers and communities-at-large. 

First, we need to reduce the vulnerability of critical facilities and 
hospitals and evacuation centers in hurricane zones. We can all re-
call,  in  Hurricane  Charley,  the  catastrophic  failure  of  the  Turner 
Arcadia  Civic  Center  in  Central  Florida  which  lost  a  roof  and  a 
large  masonry  wall  while  it  was  sheltering  1,200  persons.  This  is 
something  that  we  must  avoid.  In  addition,  over  a  dozen  hospitals 
were  damaged  during  the  four  hurricanes  that  made  landfall  in 
2004. Most of that damage was not to major structural systems, it 
was  to  building  envelopes,  loss  of  windows,  loss  of  wall  claddings 
and roof claddings, but the hospital still had to be evacuated. 

The  other  issue  I  have—and  perhaps  Jim  and  I  can  discuss  this 
afterwards—is  finding  practical  alternatives  to  mandatory  evacu-
ation of hundreds of thousands of coastal residents at the threat of 
a storm. I am from Trinidad and Tobago. I live on an island. Evac-
uation  is  not  an  option.  When  a  hurricane  approaches,  you  batten 
down the hatches and you stay in your building once you’re outside 
of  that  storm-surge  zone.  The  idea  behind  us  all  placing  hundreds 
of thousands of people in cars for ten hours at a time, to me, is not 
necessarily the only solution, or perhaps the best solution for that. 
Many  have  commented  that  the  possibility  of  a  fast-moving  accel-
erating  storm  can  cause  significant  loss  of  life  if  that  affects  those 
people in their cars on the Interstate. 

And,  third,  the  idea  of  developing  affordable  structural  systems 
to improve the poor performance of residential construction. In par-
ticular,  the  idea  of  the  residential  construction  is  the  segment  of 
the construction industry that really does not perform that well be-
cause  the  structures  are  primarily  not  engineered  structures. 
Clemson University researchers did tests on—that led to—this is a 
manufactured  home  built  in  accordance  with  the  HUD  guidelines 
of  1994.  It  survived  in  that  Port  Charlotte  manufactured-home 
park  unscathed.  All  that  damage  comes  from  the  older  manufac-
tured homes. This was a direct result of research and collaboration 
with the construction industry. 

And  in  Horry  County  itself  in  2000,  we  did  some  tests  on  those 
houses  that  were  flood-damaged  and  FEMA  bought  in  2000,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

here it was—we actually installed load cells and literally broke this 
thing  apart  and  found  out  what  would  the  capacity  be  before  and 
after hurricane retrofits. This type of research is necessary and im-
portant  for  us  to  continue  to  develop  and  learn  from  this  what  is 
existing. 

Here again, we see one of the houses where we just simply pulled 
it up to find the uplift capacity. We would recognize that those are 
not  plywood  or  OSB  sheathing,  but  plank  roofs.  When  we  tried  to 
fail  that  with  our  wind-pressure  test  chamber,  it  couldn’t  fail,  be-
cause  the  design  or  the  construction  of  a  plank  roof  requires  two 
nails  at  every  single  plank.  That  structure  failed  at  about  450 
pounds  per  square  foot,  as  opposed  to  the  60  to  80  pounds  per 
square foot that plywood would fail. 

We, as the community, have made the choice to use plywood, for 
other reasons, so, therefore, we need to make the choice that if we 
have  an  idea  of  what  the  strength  of  a  material  is,  then  we  must 
be  able  to  say,  ‘‘Well,  what  will  we,  as  a  community,  want  to  tol-
erate, in terms of failure and damage?’’ It is up to the communities 
themselves  to  ask  these  questions  of  me,  of  us  researchers,  of  the 
Federal agencies, to decide what to do. 

The  fact  remains,  we  need  to  build  stronger  buildings  and  safer 
homes  and  businesses.  We  also  need  critical  facilities  that  are  de-
signed  to  higher  standards  so  that  they  would  survive  this  storm 
and  serve  the  community  when  the  community  needs  them  the 
most.  Basic  engineer—wind  engineering  research  can  provide  the 
information necessary to adjust design and construction methods so 
as  to  more  efficiently  increase  the  resistance  of  the  built  environ-
ment to hurricanes. 

The  Wind  Load  Test  Facility  at  Clemson  is  a  resource  for  South 
Carolina  and  the  country—as  it  is  an  internationally-recognized 
center  that  consistently  provides  knowledge  and  information  that 
affects our public policy and building codes. An increase in Federal 
funding  for  wind  engineering  research  would  allow  research  to  be 
performed  whose  results  would  improve  our  understanding  of  hur-
ricane-induced  damage.  That  better  understanding  can  be  incor-
porated  into  building  codes,  into  practice,  into  public  policies  so 
that hurricane damage can be better managed by the local commu-
nity and by national agencies. 

I  urge  you  and  the  Committee  to  consider  the  needs  of  South 
Carolina and the country, and ask that you support increased Fed-
eral funding for wind engineering research. The benefits of such re-
search to the country would be significant, and the Wind Load Test 
Facility at Clemson would have the opportunity to apply to a much 
larger  source  of  funds  for  monies  than  what  is  currently  available. 
Chairman  DeMint,  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  your 
staff  on  hurricane  issues,  whether  the  issues  be  public  policy  con-
cerns, technical engineering decisions, or wind-related matters. 

That’s the end of my testimony. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Prevatt follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID O. PREVATT, PH.D., PE, ASSISTANT PROFESSOR AND 
DIRECTOR,  WIND LOAD TEST FACILITY,  DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL ENGINEERING, 
CLEMSON UNIVERSITY 

1. Introduction 

Chairman DeMint and members of the Subcommittee, my name is David Prevatt, 
and  I  am  a  professional  engineer  and  an  Assistant  Professor  of  Civil  Engineering 
at  Clemson  University.  Since  1990,  I  have  been  doing  research  to  mitigate  the  ef-
fects  of  hurricanes  to  low-rise  coastal  structures.  I  also  direct  the  Wind  Load  Test 
Facility,  which  is  a  research  laboratory  focused  on  research  to  mitigate  the  effects 
of  hurricane  wind  loads  on  low-rise  buildings.  We  are  actively  involved  in  creating 
basic  knowledge  and  developing  practical  solutions  for  use  by  engineers  and  home-
owners  to  improve  the  resistance  of  buildings  to  hurricanes,  thereby  minimizing 
damage and reducing loss. 

I  very  much  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  this  Subcommittee  and 
to  testify  in  this  hearing.  In  this  testimony  I  will  first  present  an  engineer’s  view 
of the potential for catastrophic hurricane damage facing our South Carolina coastal 
communities.  Next,  I  will  present  my  observations  of  structural  damage  during  the 
2004  hurricane  season  and  present  recommendations  that  can  reduce  the  vulner-
ability of buildings. Finally, I will discuss what the engineering research community 
is doing to reduce wind damage to and vulnerability of buildings in hurricane-prone 
areas, and how the research community’s results affect public policy. 

For almost a generation (1965 to 1994), the frequency of hurricanes in the North 
Atlantic Tropical Cyclone Region was relatively low and few hurricanes made land-
fall in the U.S. Concurrently during this period, there has been urban development 
along vulnerable U.S. coastlines, and as a result, about 50 percent of the U.S. popu-
lation  now  lives  in  hurricane  prone  coastal  areas.  Hundreds  of  miles  of  once  empty 
coastlines are now major population centers with trillions of dollars of buildings and 
infrastructure exposed to the risk of hurricane damage. 

Mitigating  hurricane  damage  is  of  special  concern  to  Americans  living  in  our 
coastal  communities  including  the  coastal  communities  of  South  Carolina.  Public 
and private support for science and technology research is urgently needed in order 
to  address  the  mounting  economic  losses  and  manage  the  risks  from  future  hurri-
canes. 

Currently,  Federal  support  for  hurricane  research  lags  woefully  behind  support 
for  other  natural  hazards.  In  2000,  Margaret  Davidson  of  NOAA-Coastal  Services 
comparing  the  research  funding  for  earthquake  risk  with  hurricane  risk  provided 
data showing that while the total damage from earthquakes in the 20th century was 
only  about  half  the  total  damage  from  hurricanes  ($47.97  billion  to  $100.7  billion), 
the research funding for earthquake reduction was seven times greater than funding 
for  hurricane  research  (>$350  million  for  earthquake  as  opposed  to  $50  million  for 
hurricane research).1 

The  scenario  in  the  21st  century  will  be  different;  more  property  is  at  risk  from 

hurricanes and more lives that will be affected. 

Four Questions to Consider: 
• What  will  it  mean  to  the  Myrtle  Beach  (and  Charleston)  tourism  industry  and 
to  the  State  of  South  Carolina  when  (not  if)  a  large,  powerful  hurricane  makes 
landfall? 

• What would be the impact of such a disaster on the lives of many full-year resi-
dents who rely on the tourism, timber and fisheries industries for employment? 
• If strengthening all buildings will minimize future losses, what should engineer-
ing  science  and  technology  researchers  do  to  support  coastal  community  efforts 
to protect itself from the threat of future hurricane damage? 
• Is the community better served by spending already limited resources on inevi-
table  post-hurricane  repairs  or  instead,  systematically  investing  in  scheduled 
‘‘pre-hurricane’’ Improvements to buildings? 

The  Grand  Strand  may  face  as  a  minimum,  $3  billion  to  $4  billion  in  damages 
and  an  extended  recovery  period  lasting  6  to  8  months  or  longer.  In  1990,  partici-
pants  who  attended  the  ASCE-sponsored  Hurricane  Hugo—One  Year  Later  Con-
ference 2 may  recall  that  the  city  of  Charleston  was  still  picking-up  and  repairing 

1 Alvarez,  Ricardo  (ed.)  ‘‘Proceedings  of  the  National  Hurricane  Hazard  Reduction  Act  Meet-

ing,’’ Feb. 2000, International Hurricane Research Center, Florida International University. 

2 Sill, B.L. (Clemson Univ); Sparks, P.R. eds. Source: Hurricane Hugo One Year Later, ASCE, 

1991, 293p. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

its buildings during those deliberations 12 months after Hugo. Although the loss to 
the forestry and fisheries industries may as yet be beyond our control, as engineers 
we  can  and  should  do  something  to  improve  the  resistance  of  our  built  infrastruc-
ture  to  withstand  hurricanes  and  minimize  loss.  Furthermore,  as  illustrated  by  the 
Northridge  (1994)  and  Loma  Prieta  (1989)  earthquakes,  Hurricane  Andrew  (1992), 
and other natural disasters many small businesses close—never to reopen—because 
of the inability to reconstruct and service customers and clients in a timely manner. 
2. Hurricane Catastrophe Potential for South Carolina 

I  have  come  here  to  advocate  on  behalf  of  the  researchers  and  this  community 
for  an  increase  in  Federal  support  for  science  and  technology  research  to  develop 
hurricane  mitigation  and  risk  management  activities.  With  the  predicted  upswing 
in frequency and intensity of hurricanes over the next few decades, and the growing 
populations  living  in  vulnerable  coastal  cities,  losses  from  hurricanes  will  escalate 
in  coastal  communities  unless  we  can  better  understand—and  manage—the  effects 
of hurricanes on the built environment; understanding that can only result from fed-
erally funded basic wind engineering research. 

Horry  County,  South  Carolina,  has  enjoyed  impressive  growth  in  its  population 
over  the  past  15  years,  increasing  approximately  44  percent  from  about  145,000  in 
1990  to  about  210,000  today.  The  Grand  Strand  region  is  a  significant  contributor 
to the economic well-being of the state. However, hurricanes and the threat of hurri-
canes continue to be detrimental to this tourism-based economy. Comprehensive and 
sustained efforts to alleviate this threat will be needed to support the regional tour-
ism-recovery  program  being  developed  by  state  and  local  leaders.  The  effort  should 
focus  on:  (1)  improving  the  performance  of  all  buildings,  both  residential  and  com-
mercial  to  maintain  functionality  of  the  community,  and  (2)  managing  expected 
losses that will occur. 

Myrtle Beach will suffer economic losses if the hotels along the Grand Strand are 
not  full  of  paying  guests  because  of  a  lack  of  basic  services,  infrastructure  and  be-
cause the swimming pools facing the beach are filled with sand. But while I expect 
hotel  buildings  would  sustain  some  damage,  single  family  residences  are  the  struc-
tures  most  likely  to  be  damaged  significantly.  Wind  loads  on  low-rise  buildings— 
wood-framed  structures  in  particular—have  received  more  attention  recently  be-
cause of the large economic losses they have sustained during hurricanes in the last 
10 years. Residential construction continues to bear the brunt of damage to the built 
environment from hurricanes.3 

The main reason for the poor performance of this building type is that residential 
structures  are  typically  not  engineered  to  resist  loads.  Rather,  the  construction 
methods  have  been  developed  empirically  over  time.  I  use  the  term  ‘‘engineered 
structure’’  to  described  any  structure  in  which  all  of  its  components  have  been  de-
signed  in  a  rational  manner,  using  latest  information  on  the  expected  loads,  and 
knowledge of the material strengths. Such structures are designed to have a reason-
able  margin  of  safety.  It  is  through  technology  transfer  of  fundamental  research 
knowledge  to  the  practicing  engineers  and  code  officials  that  the  latest  knowledge 
becomes available and improved building methods implemented. 

Another concern for the Grand Strand region and South Carolina is the perform-
ance of the critical facilities during a hurricane. As I will describe later in this testi-
mony,  hospitals,  evacuation  shelters,  police  and  fire  stations  remain  vulnerable  to 
damage  and  some  of  these  will  not  be  functional  during  or  after  a  hurricane.  Also, 
mandatory evacuations of hundreds of thousands can be a problem with large coast-
al  populations.  Many  experts  have  stated  that  a  fast  moving  storm  could  result  in 
large loss of life among persons in traffic jams trying to evacuate.4 

Based  on  the  above  observations,  hurricanes  cause  damage  due  to  one  of  three 

reasons: 

• A hurricane exceeded the design requirements of the community. 
• Structures were poorly designed. 
• Structures were poorly constructed. 
Research performed at the WLTF addresses all three reasons: 

1.  For  what  hurricane  should  a  community  be  designed?  The  knowledge  exists 
to  design  and  construct  structures  to  resist  100  percent  of  the  hurricanes  100 

3 Rosowsky,  David;  Schiff,  Scott,  What  are  our  expectations,  objectives,  and  performance  re-
quirements for wood structures in high wind regions? Natural Hazards Review, v 4, n 3, August, 
2003, p 144–148. 

4 Reinhold,  Tim  (2005)  Testimony  Given  at  Disaster  Prevention  and  Prediction  Hearing:  Se-

vere Storms and Reducing Their Impact on Communities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

percent  of  the  time;  however,  no  one  wants  to  pay  for—or  occupy—such  struc-
tures  and,  therefore,  hurricane  damage  will  occur.  The  WLTF  recognizes  that 
a  community’s  willingness  to  rebuild  after  a  hurricane  is  reflected  in  building 
code requirements. Viz., lower requirements would result in frequent rebuilding 
while higher requirements would require less rebuilding but larger initial costs. 
Thus,  the  building  codes  reflect  a  community’s  willingness  to  spend  money  on 
rebuilding.  The  WLTF’s  research  considers  varying  design  and  construction  re-
quirements according the needs of a community, effectively participating in the 
development of public policy. 
2.  Poor  design.  Students  that  have  participated  in  the  WLTF  in  their  studies 
have  a  solid  understanding  of  wind  effects  on  the  built  environment.  The  vast 
majority of these students work as structural engineers after graduation and in-
corporate what they have learned about wind into their design decisions. 
3. Poor construction. Some research at the WLTF studies existing structures so 
as  to  identify  if  they  are  vulnerable  to  wind  events  that  are  smaller  than  that 
specified  in  the  building  code,  and—if  they  are  deficient—the  most  efficient 
manner of rehabilitating structures to resist the required loads. 

For  the  above  reasons,  we  need  to  build  stronger  buildings  and  safer  homes  and 
businesses,  and  we  need  critical  facilities  that  are  designed  to  higher  standards  so 
they would survive and be able to serve the community when the community needs 
them  the  most.  Basic  wind  engineering  research  can  provide  the  information  nec-
essary  to  adjust  design  and  construction  methods  so  as  to  most  efficiently  increase 
the resistance of the built environment to hurricanes. 
3. An Engineer’s Observations from the 2004 Hurricanes 

The  2004  hurricane  season  provided  a  real-time  laboratory  for  me  and  other  re-
searchers  from  across  the  country.  WLTF  researchers  and  students  set  up  field  ex-
periments in 3 of the 4 storms (Hurricanes Charley, Frances and Ivan) and we con-
ducted post-hurricane investigations to observe and document damage. Our research 
involved  collecting  wind  speed  data  and  posting  it  to  the  World  Wide  Web  and 
instrumenting houses to measure wind pressures on roofs. 

Generally, we observed that houses built under the latest codes or deemed-to-com-
ply documents and which were not directly exposed to storm surge did not fail cata-
strophically.  Instead,  houses  experienced  the  failure  of  building  envelope  compo-
nents, (roofing, wall cladding, windows, and doors); the same failures that have been 
occurring for over 50 years. 

We  found  that  small  breaches  in  the  building  envelope,  especially  in  the  roofing 
systems  and  soffits  can  provide  paths  for  water  leakage  that  results  in  extensive 
water  damage  to  the  interior  walls,  ceilings  and  to  building  contents.  Such  minor 
failures (loss of asphalt shingle and underlayment) to one Pensacola house resulted 
in water damage to about 80 percent of all interior finishes on the ceiling and walls. 
Drying  out  of  water-soaked  buildings  to  prevent  mold  growth  and  decay  after  the 
envelope  has  been  breached  became  BIG  business  after  the  Florida  hurricanes. 
Some of the less durable materials, insulation, gypsum sheathing and acoustic ceil-
ing tiles cannot be dried out and must be removed and replaced. 

We observed numerous engineered buildings that suffered little damage and retro-
fitted  non-engineered  houses  also  performed  satisfactorily.  In  Charley,  a  major  suc-
cess story was the good to excellent performance of newer manufactured homes that 
were  built  in  accordance  with  1994  HUD  guidelines.  Most  of  these  survived  with 
minimal damage, while adjacent older manufactured homes that did not have wind- 
resistant construction were destroyed. 

Failure  of  building  envelope  systems  had  a  more  dramatic  impact  on  hospitals 
and critical facilities during these storms. From Mobile, AL to Ft. Meyers, FL, more 
than  a  dozen  hospitals  were  damaged  or  were  evacuated  due  to  the  effects  of  the 
2004  hurricanes.  Charlotte  Regional  Hospital  in  Port  Charlotte  and  the  Navy  Hos-
pital in Pensacola both sustained damage to their roofing systems and windows. The 
Martin Memorial Medical Center in Stuart, FL, lost its elevator penthouse in Hurri-
cane  Frances  and  suffered  further  roofing  damage  and  water  damage  from  Hurri-
cane  Jeanne  three  weeks  later.  Even  the  Medical  University  of  South  Carolina  in 
Charleston  suffered  significant  damage  during  a  minimal-strength  Category  1  Hur-
ricane Garston. 

In  addition,  during  the  2004  storms,  numerous  fire  stations  and  evacuation  shel-
ters  were  not  able  to  maintain  function  throughout  or  after  the  storms,  including 
the  spectacular  failure  of  the  Turner-Arcadia  Civic  Center  in  Central  Florida  that 
suffered a masonry wall and roof collapse while 1,200 persons were sheltering from 
Hurricane  Charley.  The  failure  of  hospitals,  critical  facilities  and  evacuation  shel-
ters placed additional burdens on the already stretched civic institutions which had 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

to  consider  removal  of  sick  patients,  interruption  of  emergency  protection  services 
(fire  stations  and  police  stations).  When  we  recall  that  most  of  these  facilities  did 
not  experience  forces  near  their  design  levels,  we  begin  to  realize  the  enormity  of 
the problems facing us today. 

It  is  my  expectation  that  we  would  see  similar  building  failures  here  if  a  hurri-
cane  made  landfall  in  South  Carolina.  With  buildings  located  among  our  forested 
areas,  tree  damage  may  also  be  a  factor  here.  South  Carolina  needs  buildings  with 
structural  and  building  envelope  components  that  are  designed  and  constructed  so 
that they do not fail prematurely in winds below their design wind speed. Unfortu-
nately,  as  illustrated  by  Hurricane  Hugo,  South  Carolina  should  expect  significant 
amounts of damage to occur at wind speeds below design wind speeds. 
3.1 Practical Construction and Retrofit Recommendations 

South  Carolina  has  adopted  state-wide,  the  International  Code  Council’s  (ICC) 
International  Building  Code  (IBC)  2000  building  code.  This  document  provides  the 
most current available information and best-practice design to construct wind-resist-
ant  buildings.  Provided  legislation  is  not  enacted  so  as  to  weaken  code  provisions, 
the  IBC  provides  appropriate  standards  for  the  construction  and  retrofit  of  coastal 
houses. 

The  extensive  damage  to  the  building  envelope  during  high  wind  events  can  be 
reduced by providing durable flashing materials in window openings and continuous 
water  barriers  in  walls  and  roofs.  These  recommendations  are  good  practice  and 
should be installed whether in a high wind zone or not. Furthermore, the following 
table presents options for reducing the vulnerability to wind damage. 

While some options may at first appear radical, with the right research and bene-
fits/costs  analyses  it  is  possible  to  determine  appropriate  systems  for  our  changing 
and growing coastal communities. 
4. Research at the Wind Load Test Facility 

Since 1991, research at the Wind Load Test Facility (WLTF) has made great con-
tributions  to  improving  building  codes  and  increasing  our  understanding  of  wind 
forces. The facility was founded with Federal funds obtained from FEMA under the 
Stafford Act as part of the post-Hurricane Hugo mitigation effort. 

I  believe  our  most  important  contribution  to  the  state  is  the  role  we  play  in  the 
education  and  training  of  future  civil  engineers.  We  have  produced  over  60  engi-
neers  who  did  their  Masters  and  Ph.D.  projects  at  the  WLTF.  Many  of  these  men 
and  women  continue  to  work  as  civil  engineers  within  South  Carolina.  Through 
their  research,  our  graduates  became  sensitized  to  wind  engineering  issues  and  to 
the  vulnerability  of  the  state’s  infrastructure  and  they  (we)  continue  to  spread  the 
message  that  we  have  the  know-how  to  construct  hurricane-resistant  structures  for 
our communities. 

We  use  the  atmospheric  boundary  layer  wind  tunnel  to  conduct  studies  to  deter-
mine wind loads on residential construction and non-engineered structures. Our cur-
rent research focus remains on the wind loading of buildings within suburban neigh-
borhoods  because  so  little  information  is  available  to  designers.  Science  and  tech-
nology  advances  at  universities  have  made  significant  improvements  in  the  instru-
mentation  and  data  collection  of  loads  on  buildings.  Recent  research  collaborations 
by  Clemson  University,  Florida  University  and  Florida  International  University  on 
the Florida Coastal Monitoring Program 5 have provided full-scale data in real-time, 
on near-ground level wind speeds that is helping NOAA’s Hurricane Research Divi-
sion  verify  the  accuracy  of  wind  speed  predictions.  In  addition,  wind  pressure  data 
collected  from  actual  residential  buildings  allows  us  to  determine  the  loads  on  the 
roofs. This work has also provided a means to validate results of wind tunnel stud-
ies against full-scale data. 

We are grateful for the financial and other support of many organizations, includ-
ing the South Carolina and Florida Sea Grant Consortia, FEMA, NOAA, the Florida 
Department  of  Consumer  Affairs,  the  Institute  for  Business  and  Home  Safety  and 
the South Carolina Department of Insurance. 

Through  our  full-scale  destructive  testing  of  houses  in  Horry  County  before  and 
after  installation  of  hurricane  retrofits,  researchers  were  able  to  determine  how 
much  strength  was  being  added  to  the  structure  using  various  retrofit  techniques. 
The  houses  were  made  available  because  they  were  bought  by  FEMA  following  the 
extreme flooding in Hurricane Floyd. 

With  our  wind  tunnel  testing  program  and  related  research,  we  will  develop  de-
sign  methods  for  critical  building  components  and  connections  applicable  to  wood- 
framed  structures.  Our  missile  impact  tests  have  been  used  to  test  the  impact  re-

5 http://users.ce.ufl.edu/6fcmp/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

sistance  of  lightweight  plastic  composites  and  aluminum  shutters.  Our  research  re-
mains  focused  on  developing  cost-effective  methods  for  reducing  damage;  the  dam-
age  mitigations  methods  should  provide  the  greatest  reduction  in  damage  for  the 
least  cost.  However,  the  ability  to  develop  methods  is  limited  by  the  lack  of  funds 
for performing the necessary research. 

While the construction cost of an individual home does not justify extensive wind 
tunnel  testing  or  engineering  input,  the  design  professional  needs  to  have  an  idea 
of  the  wind  loads  to  which  a  house  is  susceptible.  Knowledge  of  loads  is  the  basis 
for sound engineering design. There has as yet been little incentive for the housing 
industry to undertake the research needed to refine these loads because home build-
ers  perceive  any  modification  to  design  loads  as  increasing  the  cost  of  a  house  and 
is,  therefore,  bad  business  practice.  Therefore,  the  research  at  the  WLTF  provides 
a valuable and unique contribution to knowledge of hurricane-resistant construction, 
not only for South Carolina, but for the entire country. The knowledge and informa-
tion  from  research  performed  at  the  WLTF  is  used  to  improve  deemed-to-comply 
building codes by incorporating more engineering knowledge into our houses. 

Four areas of ongoing WLTF research are: 
• Understanding  the  full-scale  wind  load  and  validation  of  wind  tunnel  tech-

• Condition and risk assessment of critical facilities, evacuation shelters and hos-

niques. 

pitals. 

• Load path investigation for wood-framed roofing structures. 
• Performance-based design criteria for building envelope components. 

5. Summary 

The  cost  of  hurricanes  is  something  that  we  must  bear  as  a  community.  It  is  fit-
ting  that  the  community  be  involved  in  the  mitigation  efforts.  The  increasing  num-
bers  of  large,  more  complex  coastal  cities  and  urban  centers  with  unprecedented 
wealth  and  industry  concentrated  in  small  geographical  locations  makes  it  impor-
tant that serious consideration be given to designs of all construction that are capa-
ble to withstand the onslaught of hurricanes. 

The increasing annual amounts of damage from hurricanes and the inherent dan-
ger to millions of residents have created a greater incentive to understand the load 
regime  and  performance  of  residential  buildings  in  suburban  neighborhoods.  Gov-
ernment funding is needed for the broad generic research that will lead to improved 
loading information and the subsequent development of improved construction tech-
niques.  This  improved  information  would  be  incorporated  in  the  country’s  building 
codes. 

However,  providing  improved  building  techniques  and  enforcement  of  building 
codes is only part of the solution. A strong political resolve must also exist that will 
improve the construction and performance of the country’s buildings. In addition to 
improved building codes, incentives or policies that encourage consumer demand for 
better-constructed buildings are required. The WLTF recognizes the need for partici-
pating  in  the  development  of  public  policy  that  will  promote  hurricane  under-
standing. 

Our  coastal  communities  should  be  able  to  rely  upon  the  continued  efforts  of 
Clemson’s  Wind  Load  Test  Facility  and  allied  testing  laboratories  and  universities 
to  develop  the  understanding  of  wind  load,  knowledge  of  structural  performance  of 
our  buildings  and  to  perform  the  engineering  research  that  leads  to  cost-effective 
solutions  for  improved  building  performance.  Our  efforts  cannot  continue  indefi-
nitely  without  the  commitment  to  support  hurricane  research  and  the  support  of 
coastal communities and organizations in South Carolina. 

The good news is that Hope is around the corner! Ongoing related efforts at other 
(academic,  etc.)  institutions,  and  the  wind  engineering  community  have  led  to  the 
National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Act  of  2004,  H.R.  3980,  being  passed  by  the 
108th  Congress.  When  appropriated  this  bill  would  increase  available  annual  fund-
ing for wind engineering research to about $22 million. 

By  providing  research  that  helps  us  forecast,  prepare  for  and  understand  hurri-
canes,  the  engineering  research  community  continues  to  make  a  valuable  contribu-
tion  to  a  more  sustainable  and  hurricane-resistant  community  on  the  coasts  of 
South Carolina and beyond. The WLTF at Clemson is a resource for South Carolina 
and  the  country  as  it  is  an  internationally  recognized  center  that  consistently  pro-
vides  knowledge  and  information  that  affects  public  policy  and  building  codes.  An 
increase  in  Federal  funding  for  wind  engineering  research  would  hopefully  improve 
the ability of the WLTF to perform research that would benefit South Carolina and 
the rest of the country. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Dr. Prevatt. Very interesting. 
Mr. Whitten. 

STATEMENT OF PAUL D. WHITTEN, DIRECTOR, 

HORRY COUNTY PUBLIC SAFETY DIVISION 

Mr. WHITTEN. Yes, sir. 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear.  I  truly  appreciate  the 
opportunity  to  share  my  thoughts  on  hurricane  preparedness  in 
South  Carolina,  and  specifically  on  the  Grand  Strand.  I  also  wish 
to  state  that  these  statements  are  mine  alone  and  do  not  nec-
essarily  represent  the  opinions  of  the  Horry  County  Government. 
I’ve  been  involved  in  the  hurricane  preparedness  and  response 
business  since  1992,  when  I  responded  to  Hurricane  Andrew  in 
South Florida. Since then, I’ve also worked at the State Emergency 
Management  Division  for  South  Carolina,  where  I  served  as  the 
state’s first hurricane program manager. 

In  1997,  I  moved  to  Horry  County,  where  I  became  the  Emer-
gency  Management  Director,  and,  as  such,  I  dealt  with  several 
storms  at  the  local  level,  also.  In  2000,  I  became  the  public  safety 
director dealing with this, again, still on a larger level. 

We  cannot  continue  to  ignore  the  threat  that  hurricanes  pose  to 
our coastal communities. A number of factors are combining to cre-
ate a potentially serious tragedy. 

The  two  biggest  factors  I  see  are  the  growth  of  our  coastal  com-
munities.  Horry  County  has  experienced  a  tremendous  surge  of 
population.  Many  of  the  new  residents  are  from  areas  that  do  not 
experience hurricanes, and, since they do not have any experience, 
they  have  no  practical  knowledge  in  dealing  with  storms.  In  addi-
tion,  one  of  the  fastest-growing  segments  of  our  population  is  the 
55-and-older demographics. 

As  you  also  stated,  we’re  in  an  increased  period  of  hurricane  ac-
tivity.  A  lot  of  the  hurricane  experts  believe  that  this  period  is 
going to see us up to possibly 21 main storms this year. 

If we honestly face this reality, we realize we must begin to bet-
ter prepare our communities. To accomplish this, I believe we must 
consider  implementing  the  following  actions  to  the  Grand  Strand. 
The  number-one  priority  is  the  development  of  a  southern  con-
nector. The southern part of the Grand Strand must have an effec-
tive evacuation route. We continue to put people at risk by not hav-
ing  a  good  evacuation  route  for  tens  of  thousands  of  our  residents 
living  in  Surfside  Beach,  Garden  City  Beach,  and  the  Waccamaw 
Neck  and  surrounding  areas.  Research  indicates  that  too  many 
people  fail  to  evacuate  because  they  do  not  want  to  get  caught  in 
the huge traffic jams that have been mentioned. 

I  believe  South  Carolina  has  one  of  the  most  effective  hurricane 
plans  in  the  Nation.  The  South  Carolina  Emergency  Preparedness 
Division  provides  the  Governor  with  the  information  and  rec-
ommendations that guide the state through the evacuation process. 
And, while South Carolina has implemented many innovative traf-
fic  procedures,  such  as  lane  reversals  and  counterflow  operations, 
the  reality  is  that  the  lack  of  actual  road  infrastructure  still  ham-
pers every evacuation on the Grand Strand. 

The  second  issue  I  think  we  need  to  tackle  is  the  development 
of a real mitigation program. Historically, the Federal Government 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

has  spent  a  tremendous  amount  of  money  on  post-disaster  assist-
ance. However, we must acknowledge that it’s better and more cost 
efficient when we emphasize pre-disaster mitigation. We have seen 
progress in this area, especially with the requirement for state and 
local  mitigation  plans,  but  without  funding  these  plans  are  dif-
ficult, if not impossible, to implement. 

In  addition,  we  must  be  smarter  about  developing  in  high-risk 
areas. Through the National Flood Insurance Program, the Federal 
Government  spends  a  tremendous  amount  of  money  on  repetitive 
lost  properties.  These  are  properties  that  are  in  flood-prone  areas, 
and we continually pay to repair these properties, to the point that 
it would be more cost effective to acquire and demolish them. 

The  third  issue  is  the  development  of  a  medical  evacuation  pro-
gram. One of the biggest unsolved problems facing coastal commu-
nities  is  our  inability  to  adequately  manage  what  I  refer  to  as  a 
medical-community  evacuation.  Horry  County  has  numerous  nurs-
ing  homes,  assisted-living  centers,  hospitals,  and  bed-bound  citi-
zens in a potential evacuation zone. The resources just do not exist 
in the local area to conduct an evacuation of these citizens. 

We’ve been working on this issue since Hurricane Bertha in July 
of  1996.  Despite  efforts  to  address  this  issue,  I  believe  we  are  still 
not  capable  of  implementing  a  full  evacuation  of  this  medical  com-
munity. In the event of evacuation, such as the one caused by Hur-
ricane Floyd in 1999, this would put us in the position of probably 
leaving some of our most vulnerable citizens in the evacuation zone 
during a major hurricane. 

Since  Hurricane  Hugo  hit  in  September  of  1989,  South  Carolina 
has made tremendous progress in preparing for the next hurricane. 
I’m  impressed  by  the  dedication  of  the  government  agencies  and 
the private organizations that worked together in this effort. How-
ever,  I’ve  seen  the  impact  that  a  storm  can  have  on  communities. 
Preparing  a  community’s  infrastructure  is  an  obvious  goal  of  local 
government; but until the business community is restored, recovery 
is  not  complete.  Many  times,  this  is  a  neglected  component  in  the 
process. 

In addition, I’ve been with families that have had their lives and 
homes destroyed by the impact of a major storm. Walking through 
a  house  with  a  family  that  has  had  six  feet  of  flood  water  in  their 
home, you realize the devastation that occurs both to the structure 
and to the family unit. Even if we had been able to assist them in 
rebuilding, I can’t help but thinking that prevention is a better so-
lution. 

I learned, many years ago in this business, that landfalling hur-
ricanes  have  predictable  consequences.  And  predictable  is  prevent-
able. We must guide to ensure a teamwork approach, including the 
Federal  Government,  state  government,  local  governments,  private 
agencies, and individual citizens. This teamwork must focus on the 
entire  cycle  of  disaster,  with  a  special  emphasis  on  mitigation. 
We’ve  worked,  in  a  number  of  times,  with  agencies  such  as  the 
Clemson University’s Wind Load Test Facility that Dr. Prevatt dis-
cussed  and  showed.  We  initiated  that  process  literally  days  after 
Hurricane Floyd started, when we realized we were going to be ac-
quiring houses. We wanted to make them available to the Clemson 
University Wind Load Test Facility to conduct research. We see the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

benefits  of  that  research  at  the  local  level  and  fully  support  their 
efforts. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  come  to  talk  to  you  today.  And 

if you have any questions, I’ll be glad to answer them. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Whitten follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PAUL D. WHITTEN, DIRECTOR, 

HORRY COUNTY PUBLIC SAFETY DIVISION 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before this subcommittee. I truly appre-
ciate being able to share my thoughts on hurricane preparedness in South Carolina, 
and specifically on the Grand Strand. I also wish to state that these statements are 
mine alone, and do not necessarily represent the opinions of Horry County Govern-
ment. 

We cannot continue to ignore the threat of hurricanes to our coastal communities. 
A number of factors are combining to create a potentially serious tragedy. These fac-
tors include: 

1.  The  growth  of  our  coastal  communities.  Horry  County  is  experiencing  a  tre-
mendous  surge  in  population.  Many  of  the  new  residents  come  from  areas  that 
do  not  experience  hurricanes,  and  have  no  practical  knowledge  about  dealing 
with storms of this nature. In addition, one of the fastest growing demographics 
in our area is the 55 and older group. 
2.  An  increased  period  of  hurricane  activity.  Many  hurricane  experts  believe 
that we are in a period of increased hurricane activity. This year we are already 
on  our  9th  named  storm,  and  the  National  Hurricane  Center  is  projecting  this 
season to see up to 21 total named storms. 

If  we  honestly  face  this  reality,  we  realize  we  must  begin  to  better  prepare  our 
communities.  To  accomplish  this,  I  believe  we  must  consider  implementing  the  fol-
lowing actions for the Grand Strand: 

1. DEVELOP A SOUTHERN CONNECTOR 

The  southern  part  of  the  Grand  Strand  must  have  an  effective  evacuation 
route. We continue to put people at risk by not having a good evacuation route 
for  tens  of  thousands  of  our  residents  living  in  Surfside  Beach,  Garden  City 
Beach, the Waccamaw Neck and surrounding areas. Research indicates that too 
many  people  fail  to  evacuate,  because  they  do  not  want  to  get  caught  in  huge 
traffic jams. 

I  believe  South  Carolina  has  one  of  the  most  effective  hurricane  plans  in  the 
Nation. The South Carolina Emergency Management Division provides the Gov-
ernor  with  the  information  and  recommendations  that  guide  the  state  through 
the  evacuation  process.  And  while  South  Carolina  has  implemented  innovative 
traffic  procedures,  such  as  lane-reversals,  and  counter-flow  operations,  the  lack 
of actual road infrastructure still hampers every evacuation. 

2. DEVELOP A REAL MITIGATION PROGRAM 

Historically,  the  Federal  Government  has  spent  a  tremendous  amount  of 
money  on  post-disaster  assistance.  However,  we  MUST  acknowledge  that  it  is 
better  and  more  cost-efficient  when  we  emphasize  pre-disaster  mitigation.  We 
have seen progress in this area with the requirement for local Mitigation Plans, 
but without funding, the plans are difficult, if not impossible, to implement. 

In addition, we must be smarter about developing in high-risk areas. Through 
the  National  Flood  Insurance  Program,  the  Federal  Government  spends  a  tre-
mendous  amount  of  money  on  repetitive-loss  properties.  These  are  properties 
that are in flood prone areas, and we continually pay to repair these structures, 
to  the  point  that  it  would  be  more  cost  effective  to  just  acquire  and  demolish 
them. 

3. DEVELOP A MEDICAL EVACUATION PROGRAM 

One  of  the  biggest  unsolved  problems  facing  coastal  communities  is  our  in-
ability  to  adequately  manage  what  I  refer  to  as  the  medical  community  evacu-
ation.  Horry  County  has  numerous  nursing  homes,  assisted  living  centers,  hos-
pitals,  and  bed-bound  citizens  in  the  potential  evacuation  zone.  The  resources 
just  do  not  exist  in  the  local  area  to  conduct  an  evacuation  of  these  citizens. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

We have been working on this issue since Hurricane Bertha in July 1996, and 
despite  efforts  to  address  this  concern,  I  believe  we  are  still  not  capable  of  im-
plementing a full evacuation of the medical community. In the event of an evac-
uation such as the one caused by Hurricane Floyd in 1999, would put us in the 
position  of  probably  leaving  some  of  our  most  vulnerable  citizens  in  the  evacu-
ation zone during a major hurricane. 

Since  Hurricane  Hugo  hit  in  September  of  1989,  South  Carolina  has  made  tre-
mendous progress in preparing for the next major hurricane. I am impressed by the 
dedication  of  the  government  agencies  and  the  private  organizations  that  work  to-
gether in this effort. However, I have seen the impact that a storm can have on com-
munities.  Repairing  the  community’s  infrastructure  is  an  obvious  goal  of  local  gov-
ernment,  but  until  the  business  community  is  restored,  recovery  is  not  complete. 
Many times, this is a neglected component of the process. 

In  addition,  I  have  been  with  families  that  have  had  their  homes  and  lives  de-
stroyed  by  the  impact  of  major  storms.  Walking  through  a  house  that  has  been 
flooded  6′  of  water,  you  realize  the  devastation  that  occurs,  both  to  the  structure 
and the family’s emotions. Even when we have been able to assist them in rebuild-
ing, I can’t help thinking that prevention is a better solution. 

I  learned  many  years  ago  that  land-falling  hurricanes  have  predictable  con-
sequences, and predictable is preventable. We must strive to ensure a teamwork ap-
proach,  including  the  Federal  Government,  state  government,  local  governments, 
private agencies and individual citizens. This teamwork effort must focus on the en-
tire cycle of disaster, with an emphasis on mitigation. 

Thank  you  for  coming  here  today  and  providing  the  opportunity  to  hear  these 

issues and concerns. 

Senator  DEMINT.  You  can  count  on  the  questions.  We’ll  get  to 

that after Mr. Gandy’s testimony. 

STATEMENT OF JIM GANDY, CHIEF METEOROLOGIST, 

WLTX–TV, COLUMBIA, SC 

Mr.  GANDY.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  And 

thank you for inviting me to address this hearing. 

I’m Jim Gandy, and I’m the Chief Meteorologist at WLTX in Co-
lumbia,  South  Carolina.  I’ve  been  a  professional  meteorologist  for 
30 years. I’ve been here in South Carolina for 21 years, so I’ve seen 
a few hurricanes hit the coast of our state. 

I  want  to  say  that,  first  of  all,  I’m  really  encouraged  by  what 
South  Carolina  has  done.  It  has  learned  some  hard  lessons,  and  it 
has  taken  steps  to  address  what  has  been  learned.  And  you’ve  al-
ready  heard  quite  a  bit  from  these  gentlemen  here.  And  I  want  to 
say  that  here  in  South  Carolina  we’re  very  fortunate  to  have  a  fa-
cility  doing  the  research  that’s  being  done  at  Clemson  University. 
And what the state has been doing to address some of the problems 
is  admirable.  We’ve  learned  some  lessons.  And  I  think  what  I’ll 
probably  end  up  doing  is  summarizing  what  you  have  already 
heard from these gentlemen. 

But let me just say that I was here during Hurricane Hugo, and 
there were some lessons to be learned from Hurricane Hugo. There 
is  a  critical  need  to  address  communications  after  the  storm  has 
passed. Hugo wiped out phone service. And if another hurricane of 
that nature hits our coast, it’s going to wipe out phone service and 
wireless  communications.  It’s  going  to  be  difficult  for  the  state 
agencies  to  communicate.  So,  that’s  something  that  needs  to  be 
done at both the state and local level. 

Also,  there  is  a  frustration,  not  only  from  Hugo,  but  from  just 
about  every  hurricane  that  we  encounter,  with  evacuations.  That’s 
something that’s going to have to be addressed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

From  the  public  perspective,  the  most  important  information  I 
keep hearing from the public is the extent of the damage. Now, the 
officials  are  the  first  to  go  into  the  damaged  area.  So,  the  earliest 
assessment  that  we  can  get  of  the  damage  needs  to  be  commu-
nicated  to  the  public,  because  they’re  sitting,  waiting  to  go  back, 
and  they  want  to  know.  They  need  to  know  what  the  dangers  are 
if they do go back. And they need a reasonable estimate as to when 
they  can  return  to  their  property.  That’s  a  real  frustration  I  hear 
from  the  general  public,  ‘‘When  can  I  go  back?’’  And  I  understand 
the  pressures  on  public  officials  to  tell  them  that.  And  it’s  hard 
sometimes  to  assess  what  the  damage  is  and  how  soon  people  can 
safely go back into their communities. 

The basic infrastructure needs to be restored as soon as possible 
after the storm, because when people go back, they’re going to need 
food, they’re going to need water. That needs to be addressed. 

And building codes need to be strengthened in all coastal commu-
nities. Much of the damage to homes and property comes from fly-
ing  debris,  so  whatever  we  can  do  to  reduce  flying  debris  is  going 
to help reduce the damage that’s experienced by buildings. 

Let me make a few comments about some of the lessons that we 

learned from Hurricane Floyd. 

Floyd  turned  out  to  be  the  largest  peacetime  evacuation  in  U.S. 
history. Close to three million people were evacuated during Floyd. 
And  here  in  Myrtle  Beach—being  in  Columbia,  I  heard  the  details 
of that evacuation. And during Floyd it was taking people 14 to 15 
hours  to  drive  from  Myrtle  Beach  to  Columbia,  which  is  normally 
about a three-hour drive, or a little bit less. 

There  is  a  need  for  lane  reversals,  and  it  needs  to  become  effec-
tive  as  soon  as  the  mandatory  order  is  issued.  There  is  a  need  to 
coordinate  those  evacuations  with  other  states,  because  one  of  the 
problems  with  Floyd,  people  were  evacuating  into  future  evacu-
ation zones, making that evacuation even more difficult. 

A plan needs to be established to make sure that there is enough 
fuel available for people to make the trip inland. The best example 
of  that  was  Interstate  16  in  Georgia,  going  west  from  Savannah. 
There is not a lot there. But the Interstate became gridlocked. Peo-
ple were running out of fuel, and the Interstate was essentially be-
coming a parking lot. So, that’s something that we need to address. 
People  need  better  information  about  where  to  go  for  shelters. 
Shelters  are  available.  The  problem  is  trying  to  get  that  informa-
tion  to  the  public.  And  I  think  that’s  where  not  only  local  officials 
can  help  us,  but  the  media  needs  to  be  better  at  communicating 
that information. And we can do that. 

Television  is  changing.  It’s  no  longer  television  meteorologists 
you’re  looking  at;  we’re  true  broadcast  meteorologists.  We  now 
broadcast on many different platforms—television, cable, telephone, 
radio,  and  now  wireless  communications.  In  Columbia,  we’re  the 
first  TV  station  to  have  our  website  available  to  those  who’ve  got 
PDAs. And that’s where we can broadcast a lot of information. Be-
cause if you take a look at the evacuation plan here in South Caro-
lina,  those  people  are  moving  from  the  coast,  they’re  heading  to-
ward the central part of the state. It’s all focused on Columbia. And 
when  we  can  broadcast  to  those  people  evacuating  where  those 
shelters are, that, I think, will be a big benefit. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

This  is  a  problem  that  I  have,  personally.  Senior  citizens,  those 
in  assisted-living  areas  and  residents  of  nursing  homes,  they  need 
to  be  evacuated  before  the  warning  is  issued.  And  the  reason  for 
that  is  because  they’re  the  last  people  who  need  to  be  sitting  in 
traffic.  So,  my  recommendation  is  that  they  be  evacuated  during  a 
hurricane  watch,  which  is  usually  issued  about  36  hours  before 
hurricane  conditions  are  expected.  That’s  a  tough  call,  but  it’s 
something that needs to be done. 

Other lessons. You’ve heard about South Carolina’s plan for lane 
reversals, and the current one was developed under the auspices of 
Governor  Mark  Sanford,  and  I  applaud  the  effort.  It  looks  good, 
and  I  think  it  will  work.  And  I  think  we’ve  done  the  right  thing 
here in South Carolina. The authority for those lane reversals rests 
with the Governor’s office. In Louisiana, it does not. And that prob-
lem was accentuated during Hurricane Ivan. The authority for lane 
reversals  comes  from  the  local  parishes.  The  problem  is,  it  has  to 
be  coordinated  with  the  state  police.  It  was  not,  during  Hurricane 
Ivan. And when the mandatory evacuation order was given for New 
Orleans,  it  resulted  in  gridlock.  The  order  was  given  and  made  at 
7:30  in  the  morning.  The  lane  reversals  were  not  implemented 
until the middle of the afternoon. New Orleans, having over a mil-
lion people, you can imagine what the roads were like, trying to get 
out  of  New  Orleans.  So,  that’s  something  that  we  need  to  address. 
Hurricane  Andrew  and  Hurricane  Charley  have  something  in 
common.  They  highlighted  the  need  to  strengthen  building  codes. 
We  are  all  familiar  with  the  damage  that  Hurricane  Andrew  did. 
What it did was, it highlighted the need to strengthen the building 
codes.  What  Hurricane  Charley  did  was,  showed  us  the  benefit— 
and  you  just  saw  an  example  of  that—of  the  manufactured  home 
that survived a hit by Hurricane Charley. Now, we may not be able 
to prevent all of the damage, like Andrew. Andrew was just a very 
powerful  storm.  But  that’s  rare.  A  storm  like  Charley  is  probably 
more likely. And if we can survive those storms, we can greatly re-
duce  the  damage  that’s  caused  by  these  storms.  And  so,  the  mes-
sage  is  clear,  I  think,  from  Charley,  that  if  you  can  reduce  the 
amount  of  flying  debris,  there’s  a  greater  chance  of  reducing  the 
damage. 

We  just  completed  doing  a  study.  We  just  rewrote  our  hurricane 
plan at our TV station. One of the things that we found, which was 
kind  of  interesting,  there  are  now—in  just  the  Census  figures— 
from  1970  to  the  year  2000,  the  population  of  coastal  South  Caro-
lina  grew  by  more  than  70  percent.  There  are  now  more  than  a 
million  people  living  on  the  coast  of  South  Carolina.  That’s  as 
many  people  that  live  in  the  coast  of  Georgia  and  North  Carolina, 
combined.  So,  we’ve  seen  a  tremendous  growth  in  the  population. 
On top of that, on any given weekend before Labor Day, the pop-
ulation of coastal South Carolina is two to three times that. You’re 
looking  at  two  to  three  million  people  along  the  coast  of  South 
Carolina. 

Our  worst  nightmare  is  going  to  be  a  storm  that  approaches  be-
fore  Labor  Day.  After  Labor  Day,  it’s  not  as  bad,  because  a  lot  of 
people  have  ended  their  vacations  and  kids  are  at  school,  so  you 
don’t  have  quite  the  problem  after  Labor  Day  that  you  do  before 
Labor Day. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

So,  I’m  going  to  accentuate  your  remark  by  saying  that  there  is 
a critical need for some kind of Interstate system that connects the 
Grand  Strand  with  Florence  and  I–20  so  we  can  get  people  out. 
And  that’s  in  addition  to  what  we  already  have  to  get  people  out 
of the Grand Strand. 

One  comment  that  I’d  like  to  make  concerning  global  warming. 
We know that that is taking place. Exactly how it’s going to mani-
fest itself is difficult, but we do know that sea level is rising. That’s 
going  to  affect  coastal  communities.  More  importantly,  new  re-
search  has  just  come  to  light—and  I  was  just  exposed  to  this  last 
week when I was in Washington, D.C.—and that research indicates 
that, by the middle part of this century, major hurricanes could be 
stronger  because  of  the  warming  of  ocean  waters,  so  that  what 
you’re looking at is: a major hurricane, when it occurs, is more like-
ly  to  be  stronger  than  the  major  hurricanes  that  we’re  seeing  hit-
ting  today.  A  good  example  of  that  would  be  Hurricane  Hugo, 
where  the  maximum  sustained  wind  was  estimated  at  138  miles- 
per-hour.  That  same  type  storm  hitting  in  the  middle  part  of  this 
century  is  more  likely  to  have  winds  of  150  miles-per-hour.  So, 
that’s something we need to plan for in the future. 

And,  finally,  let  me  just  say  that  we  do  a  pretty  good  job  on 
radio, but we could do better. State and local agencies need to work 
with  the  media.  We  are  the  eyes  and  the  ears  for  the  public  and 
whatever  information  that  can  come  our  way  is  generally  broad-
casted  very  quickly.  We’re  a  very  efficient  way  of  getting  informa-
tion  to  the  public.  And  any  kind  of  partnership  that  could  be 
strengthened,  I  think,  is  going  to  be  done  in  trying  to  make  these 
evacuations smooth. 

Thank you, again, for allowing me to—— 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Gandy. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Gandy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JIM GANDY, CHIEF METEOROLOGIST, 

WLTX–TV, COLUMBIA, SC 

I am Jim Gandy, Chief Meteorologist at News19 WLTX in Columbia, South Caro-
lina.  I  have  been  a  professional  meteorologist  for  30  years  and  have  worked  in  Co-
lumbia  for  21  years.  My  experience  with  hurricanes  dates  back  to  my  childhood  in 
Florida which was one of the reasons I became a meteorologist. I have worked tire-
lessly  as  a  meteorologist  trying  to  inform  and  prepare  the  public  about  hurricanes 
for many years. 

I want to thank Senator Jim DeMint and the Committee, for inviting me to testify 
before  you  today.  I  hope  that  the  comments  that  I  make  will  be  useful  in  helping 
improve  preparation  for  hurricanes  along  our  coast.  Further,  I  wish  to  state  that 
the  testimony  I  am  about  to  give  reflect  my  opinions  and  are  not  necessarily  the 
views of WLTX Television. 

Let me begin by saying that most communities recognize the danger posed by hur-
ricanes.  Most  have  done  an  effective  job  preparing  for  such  events  and  executing 
their  plans.  However,  we  continue  to  learn  as  each  storm  presents  unique  dangers. 

SOME LESSONS FROM HURRICANE HUGO 

No  other  storm  affected  South  Carolina  in  the  Twentieth  Century  like  Hurricane 
Hugo. It was the strongest hurricane to strike the state since 1893 which produced 
over  2,000  fatalities  in  the  low  country  of  South  Carolina.  The  state  and  commu-
nities  were  poorly  prepared  to  deal  with  destruction  on  such  a  large  scale.  It  took 
years  to  recover  from  the  experience.  It  is  a  fact  that  a  similar  storm  will  strike 
the state in the future and there are some lessons to be learned from Hugo: 

1. There is a critical need to address communications in the aftermath of such 
a storm. Phone service was completely eliminated after Hugo. Only ham opera-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

tors were functioning and they provided the critical communications link in the 
storm’s aftermath. Today that would extend to wireless communications as well. 
A major hurricane is likely to disrupt phone service, cable service, and wireless 
communications.  The  forms  of  communications  that  are  most  likely  to  survive 
would  be  ham  operators  and  satellite  phones.  Therefore,  it  is  imperative  that 
local and state agencies have access to multiple communications platforms. Re-
dundancy is critical to making sure some form of communication survives. 

2.  A  frustration  expressed  by  evacuees  during  Hugo  was  the  lack  of  commu-
nication between officials and the public. There were many complaints that au-
thorities were not passing along any information. Thus, a public information of-
fice  needs  to  be  established  at  either  the  state  or  local  level  to  quickly  pass  in-
formation to the media and public. Evacuees are patient when they have infor-
mation,  but  they  become  restless  with  a  lack  of  information.  The  most  impor-
tant information to communicate to the public is the extent of damage, the dan-
gers  that  might  be  present,  and  a  reasonable  estimate  as  to  when  they  can  re-
turn to their property. 

3.  The  basic  infrastructure  needs  to  be  restored  as  soon  as  possible  after  the 
storm.  People  returning  to  their  property  will  need  access  to  food  and  water 
quickly to begin the rebuilding effort. 

4.  Building  codes  need  to  be  strengthened  in  all  coastal  communities.  Much 
of  the  damage  to  homes  and  property  comes  from  flying  debris.  This  is  often 
the  result  of  a  building  disintegrating  in  the  face  of  strong  winds.  The  State  of 
Florida  seems  to  be  the  farthest  along  in  light  of  Hurricane  Andrew  and  the 
hurricanes in 2004. 

SOME LESSONS FROM HURRICANE FLOYD 

Hurricane  Floyd  resulted  in  the  largest  peacetime  evacuation  in  U.S.  history. 
More than 3 million residents fled their homes due to the potential danger from this 
storm. The experience was an unpleasant one for many who ultimately did not need 
to  evacuate.  Many  tell  stories  of  it  taking  14  to  15  hours  to  travel  from  Myrtle 
Beach  to  Columbia.  This  is  normally  a  3  hour  trip  or  less.  Of  the  lessons  learned 
from Floyd these include: 

1. There is a need for lane reversals to become effective as soon as the manda-
tory  evacuation  is  ordered.  This  usually  occurs  when  the  National  Hurricane 
Center  issues  a  hurricane  warning.  States  need  to  prepare  to  implement  the 
lane  reversals  as  soon  as  the  hurricane  watch  is  issued  or  12  hours  before  the 
need  for  mandatory  evacuation.  People  will  hesitate  to  evacuate  if  it  takes  15 
hours to make what is normally a 3 hour trip. 

2.  There  is  a  great  need  to  coordinate  evacuations  with  other  states.  This  is 
in  an  effort  to  avoid  evacuating  into  other  evacuation  zones.  This  problem  ag-
gravated the evacuations during Floyd causing even longer delays. 

3. A plan must be established to make sure there is enough fuel available for 
people  to  make  the  trip  inland.  Sections  of  Interstate  16  in  Georgia  became  a 
parking lot because stations were running out of gas. 

4.  People  need  better  information  on  where  to  go  to  take  shelter.  This  lack 
of  information  often  leads  to  evacuees  traveling  much  longer  distances  than 
needed  to  escape  the  storm.  The  media  needs  better  and  timelier  information 
on  which  shelters  are  open  and  where  they  are  located.  Wireless  communica-
tions now permit this information to be communicated even when people are not 
near a television. 

5.  Senior  citizens,  those  in  assisted  living  areas,  and  residents  of  nursing 
homes  need  to  be  evacuated  during  a  hurricane  watch.  Many  of  these  people 
may  encounter  undue  hardships  if  caught  in  the  normal  evacuation  delays. 
These people are more likely to need medical help during an emergency. 

OTHER LESSONS FOR SOUTH CAROLINA 

The  State  of  South  Carolina  now  has  a  detailed  plan  for  lane  reversals  and  the 
procedures for implementing the plan. This was done as a result of Hurricane Floyd 
as  the  request  of  Governor  Mark  Sanford.  The  plan  is  comprehensive,  flexible,  and 
relatively  quick  to  execute.  Furthermore,  the  authority  to  execute  the  plan  rests 
solely with the Governor’s office. 

The importance of where to place the authority was highlighted during Hurricane 
Ivan in 2004. Louisiana gave the authority to order lane reversals to the individual 
parishes.  The  order  was  given  in  Hurricane  Ivan,  but  it  was  not  coordinated  with 
the  state  police.  This  resulted  in  a  massive  traffic  jam  in  New  Orleans  when  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

mandatory evacuation order was given. It took more than 12 hours for the situation 
to  improve.  There  were  two  fatalities  in  this  evacuation  and  numerous  complaints 
about  the  delays.  These  delays  were  often  too  great  for  the  elderly  trying  to  evac-
uate. 

South  Carolina’s  plan  has  been  tested  in  mock  simulations,  but  it  has  yet  to  be 
tested  in  real-time.  I  believe  that  it  will  test  well  and  that  it  will  ease  the  delays 
of  a  mandatory  evacuation.  It  is  my  opinion  that  the  State  of  South  Carolina  is  on 
the right track. If it has flaws, these may not become apparent until reality strikes. 
However, the plan will not fail from lack of trying. 

Hurricane  Andrew  and  Hurricane  Charley  highlighted  the  need  for  South  Caro-
lina to strengthen its building codes. Both of these hurricanes hit Florida, but they 
showed what needed to be done and what can be done. 

Most  structures  were  completely  destroyed  when  Hurricane  Andrew  struck  south 
Florida in 1992. The resulting surveys convinced the state to strengthen its building 
codes  particularly  with  respect  to  manufactured  housing.  The  new  standards  took 
effect in 1994 and were put to the test 10 years later. 

Hurricane  Charley  roared  through  Punta  Gorda  in  2004.  The  manufactured 
homes built before 1994 were often completely destroyed or heavily damaged. Mean-
while, the post-1994 homes suffered minor damage except in cases where they were 
hit by disintegrating mobile homes built to pre-1994 standards. 

The  message  is  clear.  Any  time  you  can  reduce  the  amount  of  flying  debris  there 

is a greater chance of reducing the damage. 

OTHER CONCERNS 

The population along the South Carolina coast grew by more than 70 percent from 
1970 to 2000. There are now more than one million residents in the coastal counties 
of  South  Carolina.  However,  on  any  given  weekend  from  Memorial  Day  through 
Labor Day there are some 2 to 3 million people enjoying our coasts. My worst night-
mare  is  trying  to  evacuate  in  the  face  of  a  major  hurricane  through  the  Labor  Day 
weekend. Any problems we have now would be greatly magnified. 

Hilton Head and Charleston both have an Interstate exit to other Interstates. No 
such  Interstate  exists  for  the  Grand  Strand.  The  state  has  done  the  best  it  can 
under  the  circumstances.  However,  there  is  a  critical  need  for  an  Interstate  con-
necting the Grand Strand with Florence and Interstate 20. 

There  is  also  an  increasing  threat  to  coastal  communities  from  global  warming. 
Research indicates that by the middle of this century, sea levels will be higher and 
major hurricanes may be stronger. 

The increase in sea level will come from several sources. As the waters of the At-
lantic  warm  there  will  be  a  rise  in  sea  level  from  thermal  expansion.  In  addition, 
the  melting  of  glaciers  and  the  thinning  of  the  polar  ice  will  add  to  the  rise  of  sea 
level. The sinking of some land areas near the coast will only add to the rise of sea 
level. 

In addition to threats from the rise of sea level, the strength of major hurricanes 
may  increase  as  the  Atlantic  waters  warm.  It  has  recently  been  demonstrated  that 
the  depth  of  warm  waters  impacts  the  strength  of  hurricanes.  Hurricane  Camille 
moved over a deep and very warm eddy as it approached the Gulf coast. The energy 
available from this warm pool helped create the giant it became. 

Finally,  state  and  local  agencies  need  to  work  better  with  the  media.  The  media 
becomes  the  eyes  and  ears  for  the  public.  It  is  the  fastest  means  of  communicating 
with  the  public  and  most  versatile.  Most  television  stations  broadcast  on  many  dif-
ferent  platforms  such  as  television,  cable,  Internet,  radio,  telephone,  etc.  These  are 
the  communication  experts  and  they  need  to  be  used  more  effectively.  This  can  be 
and  should  be  done  by  better  cooperation  between  the  government  agencies  and 
media. 

This concludes my remarks concerning the threat from hurricanes. I wish to again 
thank  Senator  DeMint  and  the  Committee  for  allowing  me  to  appear  before  you 
today. 

Senator  DEMINT.  I  want  to  ask  a  few  questions.  I’m  thinking, 
like here in the Grand Strand, is it impossible for a hotel to be cer-
tified to withstand a Category 5 hurricane, and that if the prepara-
tions  with  water  reserves,  alternative  power,  would  it  not  be  even 
a good marketing tool for that hotel to be able to say, ‘‘We’re evacu-
ation-proof. You can stay here and watch the storm.’’ And I suspect 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

that  would  require  vinyl  on  glass,  shatterproof,  all  that  kind  of 
stuff. 

But  I’m  just  wondering,  just  to  start  the  discussion,  should  we 
build  all  of  our  preparation  on  the  idea  that  we’re  going  to  evac-
uate,  or  can  we,  as  Dr.  Prevatt  has  suggested,  through  research 
and  construction  techniques,  even  come—have  a  scenario  where  if 
you’re  in  one  structure,  you  have  to  get  out  of  here;  but  if  you’re 
in another one that has been certified, that you don’t—which might 
create  some—just  market-force  incentives  for  hotels  and  even  resi-
dential  areas,  builders,  to  use  research  that’s  already  existing,  be-
cause,  apparently,  from  the  slide  you  showed,  I  mean,  we  know 
how  to  build  a  structure  to  withstand  a  storm,  that  it’s  just  not 
done. 

The  cost  of  this  is  not  just  an  advantage.  Everyone  who  lives  on 
the coast is paying a premium through their insurance, constantly. 
And  those  rates  go  up  and  up  and  up,  raising  the  cost  of  living 
here, which I think is something we need to look at. 

And so, I’d just like to start with the idea, is it possible to certify 
structures  so  that  evacuation  would  not  necessarily  be  the  only 
means  to  keep  people  safe?  And,  Mr.  Gandy,  you  apparently  want 
to say something, so—— 

Mr.  GANDY.  I’m  familiar  with  the  South  Carolina  coast,  and  I 
think, here in the Grand Strand, the main focus there—and correct 
me if you disagree—but I think the main focus there, if we can get 
them out of the storm-surge area, then I think that’s a really good 
idea. Because here in—along the Grand Strand, the storm surge is 
not going to be as great as, say, down in the Low Country. And let 
me  give  you—you’re  familiar  with  the  situation  out  in  the  Low 
Country—Hilton  Head,  particularly.  That  may  not  work  for  Hilton 
Head,  but  it  could  probably  work  here  in  the  Myrtle  Beach  area. 
And  if  a  major  hurricane—say  a  Category  4  or  Category  5  hurri-
cane—were to hit down there, the storm surge potentially could go 
all the way to I–95. Now, that’s pretty far inland. And if Hurricane 
Hugo  had  hit  Savannah  instead  of  Charleston,  Hilton  Head  Island 
would have been completely submerged. 

So, I think, if we’re going to do that, we need to look at particu-
larly where the storm surge is going to be. And if you get them out 
of the storm surge, then I think you’ve done a good job. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Yes,  that  would  have  to  be  part  of  the  certifi-

cation process—— 
Mr. GANDY. Yes. 
Senator DEMINT.—I guess, but the—— 
Dr. Prevatt? 
Dr. PREVATT. Senator DeMint, this is—the idea of evacuation for 
wind  is  something  that  has  come  from  who  knows  where.  You 
know,  the  primary  reason  was  for  storm  surge.  And  wind  is  just— 
people sort of look at their neighbor and say, ‘‘Well, if you’re evacu-
ating, I’m evacuating, too,’’ and everyone jumps in their cars and— 
you  know,  and  I  heard  from  the  South  Carolina  emergency  man-
agement people yesterday in Columbia that said people were evac-
uating  not  just  one  car,  but  they  were  evacuating  two  and  three 
cars  and  the  boat.  They  wanted  to  get  everything  out  of  harm’s 
way. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

Dr. PREVATT. Now, one of the things, I think, why certified build-
ings would be a very good idea is, looking at the Florida experience, 
based  on  the  work  that  Florida  DCA  and  RCMP  are  doing  with 
their windfall insurance money funding, I think, in addition to im-
proving  the  safety  of  the  buildings  in  Florida,  it  is  an  additional 
marketing  tool  that  perhaps  Mr.  Dean  might  want  to  consider.  At 
some  point,  Florida  may  be  able  to  state  categorically  that,  ‘‘This 
building and this residential community, this resort, is certified for 
a Category 5. Why not vacation here instead of other places?’’ And 
that  is  certainly  something  that  I  can  see  using  as  a  marketing 
tool. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Myrtle  Beach  could  use  that  against  the  Low 

Country. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DEMINT. ‘‘Vacation here. We’re evacuation-free.’’ 
Dr.  PREVATT.  But,  you  know,  and  I  think  of  it  even  in  terms  of 
the  question  of  evacuation  of  hospitals  and  those  nursing  homes, 
that,  yes,  I  may  have  outlying  buildings  that  I  say  there  are  criti-
cally  ill  people  that  do  not  need  to  be  there.  They  can  move  to  a 
more  sturdily  constructed  building.  And  instead  of  staying  on  the 
ground  floor,  if  you  have  sufficient  power,  you  go  up.  You  do 
vertical evacuation, come away from the windows. I have looked at 
studies  for  the  Medical  University  of  South  Carolina  recently  in 
which  they  wished  to  upgrade  a  few  of  their  major  facilities  that 
aren’t  duplicated  in  other  areas  of  the  state,  and  they  say,  ‘‘These 
things need to be here. We’re not going to move someone on kidney 
dialysis machines and put them in a car or in an ambulance.’’ You 
know? 

And  so,  yes,  there  are  things  that  we  can  do.  For  instance,  if  I 
look  at  hotels  around  here,  one  might  consider  impact-resistant 
glass  or  a  film  on  your  glass  to  improve  that  strength.  And  one 
would  use  more  durable  materials  in  your  exterior  wall  systems. 
It’s typical to use EIFS, but they don’t work very well in wind con-
ditions. You know? 

But these things certainly, I believe, we can design it. It’s a ques-
tion  of,  Do  we  want  to  pay  for  it?  And  encouraging  people,  every-
body, that you need to pay for these up front—— 

Senator  DEMINT.  Let  me  ask,  because  you  mentioned  more  re-
search dollars, which sounds clearly like there may be some oppor-
tunity. But it doesn’t appear that the market is using the research 
that’s available today. I mean, if we’ve got things we know we can 
do in construction that can virtually make a home hurricane-proof, 
that  doesn’t  seem  to  be—at  least  I  don’t  see  that  as  something 
that’s going on, to any large degree. Is that not true, or, I mean—— 

UNIDENTIFIED PANELIST. It’s more cost than anything. 
Senator DEMINT. Yes. 
Mr.  Dean,  do  you  see  that  here,  that  folks  are  building  to  a  cer-

tain code? 

Mr. DEAN. Yes, Mr. Chairman. And I think your point’s very well 
taken. There is information that’s nice to know, there’s information 
you  need  to  know.  And,  in  this  particular  case—and  I  think  the 
Doctor indicated earlier—the research that is being done would cer-
tainly  enhance  improvements,  but,  from  the  perspective  of  a  home 
builder or, particularly, a business along the coast, if it’s a foregone 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

conclusion that during a certain level of storm you’re going to evac-
uate,  and  if  your  insurance  rates  don’t  necessarily  distinguish  be-
tween benefits of having such or not—and they don’t always do it— 
then it becomes an issue of, Is it really advantageous to do so? 

Now,  turn  that  around  from  a  problem  into  an  opportunity,  to 
your previous question. If, in fact, a certain level of code could pre-
vent a resort from having to evacuate in a storm, where the storm 
surge  is  not  going  to  be  an  issue  for  that  particular  area,  and  if 
it  did  provide  incentives,  now  there  would  be  an  incentive  to  do 
that.  And,  to  your  point  earlier,  it  would  become  very  marketable. 
So,  I  think  the  answer  to  your  question  is  that  the  information 
is being used, but it’s not advantageous such to the point that busi-
nesses need to—— 

Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  maybe  if  insurance  companies  don’t  rec-
ognize  it,  property  taxes  could.  So,  you  could  look  locally—I  think 
that Mr. Cantore may have been the one that mentioned that most 
of  the  deaths  are  from  flooding  when  people  are  moving  around, 
not necessarily from in a structure. Am I right, or is—— 

Mr. CANTORE. Well, inland flooding. 
Senator DEMINT. Yes. 
Mr.  CANTORE.  Whether  it  be  the  mountains  of  North  Carolina, 
with  Frances  and  Ivan,  you  know,  where  they  had  30  inches  of 
rain.  You  know,  you  take  a  system  that’s  supposed  to  be  in  the 
tropics,  and  you  put  it  over  the  mid-latitudes  or  in  the  United 
States,  and  you  can  have  some  big  problems  with  flooding.  And 
that is—you know, we get people away from the coast. We get them 
out  of  the  storm-surge  zones.  But  we  just  have  to  make  sure  we 
don’t put them in an area that can flood, or a low-lying area. That 
was my big concern. 

Senator DEMINT. What would have to take place, Mr. Whitten— 
and  you  mentioned,  certainly  the  elderly,  those  who  are  in  a  med-
ical  situation—if  you’re  going  to  have  someone  in  a  retirement 
home,  assisted  living,  some  kind  of  medical  building,  it  has  to  be 
in  a  certified  Category  5  storm  or  you  can’t  do  it.  I  mean,  does  it 
make  sense  to  continue  to  allow  people  to  open  and  put  folks  in 
these homes if we know that, practically, we’re not going to be able 
to evacuate and that they are not safe at storm levels? 

Mr.  WHITTEN.  Well,  and  I  think  you’re  hitting  the  exact  issue. 
And  I’m  going  to  give  you  a  little  bit  more  detailed  answer.  The 
evacuation  zones  in  South  Carolina  are  built  exclusively  on  the 
hurricane  surge.  They’re  not  wind-based  at  all.  They  are  all  hurri-
cane surge. And based on some of the data you’ve heard about, the 
inability  to  adequately  or  accurately  forecast  intensity,  we  have  to 
take some allowances for that. 

The  reality  is,  we  have  some  nursing  homes  that  are  very  well 
built.  I  believe  they  have  taken  those  extra  steps  to  increase  the 
strength  that  their  building  can  withstand  a  wind  event.  But  if 
they’re in the surge zone, then they still need to evacuate. 

Senator DEMINT. Even with the vertical evacuation idea that Dr. 

Mr.  WHITTEN.  Well,  the  problem  is,  the  existing  ones—most  of 

Prevatt mentioned? 

our existing ones are single-floor. 

Senator DEMINT. Right. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Mr.  WHITTEN.  And  the  other  thing  that  I  am—I  would  like  to 
throw  in  the  conversation  is,  we  talk  about  that  structure  being 
able to survive a storm, but the Governor has got to be able to pro-
vide infrastructure. If I can’t get you clean water, sewer, I can’t get 
you  electricity  or  telephone  service,  you’re  okay,  you’ve  survived, 
and  your  structure  might  be  fine,  but  you’ve  got  a  problem  about 
living.  We’ve  seen,  after  storms,  especially  on  the  coast  where  you 
have  the  surge,  you  see  roads  that  get  washed  out.  And  that  was 
a  big  issue  in  Folly  Beach  after  Hurricane  Hugo,  and  some  other 
places.  The  road  washes  out  from  underneath,  so  it’s  unsafe.  If  I 
can’t  deliver  public  safety—if  I  can’t  get  ambulances  and  cops  and 
fire  trucks  around,  you  might  be  down  there,  but,  if  you  have  an 
emergency, I can’t get to you. And that’s a basic obligation of local 
government.  And  so,  from  my  perspective,  I’d  rather  you  not  be  in 
that  position,  because  what  happens,  if  you  come  out,  your  house 
is  fine,  but  the  community  has  got  a  lot  of  problems  and  you  get 
hurt,  we’re  committing  a  lot  of  resources  trying  to  get  aid  to  you. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  again,  this—following  this  line  of  ques-
tioning—and  it  may  be  a  question  of  a  paradigm  of  evacuation— 
and  rather  than  the  millions  of  dollars  of  moving  people  out  and 
ultimately  moving  people  where  they  don’t  even  know  where 
they’re  going,  could  it—would  it  not  be  possible  to  have  enough 
areas  designated  that  may  be  able  to  have  reserve  water  supplies, 
reserve power, that, even if the roads were out within a half a mile 
of almost every resident, there was—there could be sources of sup-
port? Knowing that nothing is perfect, but, given the fact that peo-
ple  moving  along  the  highways,  running  out  of  gas,  elderly  people 
being  evacuated—would  it  not  be  at  least  a  compatible  or  com-
plementary strategy to look at building the capabilities to—for peo-
ple to withstand the storm where they are, or near where they are, 
that  they  should  move  to  a  vertical  evacuation  building  within  a 
mile of their home, and if we had maybe 30 of those on the Grand 
Strand—I’m  not  sure,  but  I  guess  it’s  something  we  need  to  ques-
tion. 

Mr.  WHITTEN.  I  think  there’s  some  value  to  that.  And  we  even 
have  worked  with  that.  Max  Mayfield  has  said,  ‘‘You  run  from  the 
water  and  you  hide  from  the  wind.’’  And  that’s  one  of  the  things 
that  we  try  to  push  when  we  have  an  evacuation,  is,  ‘‘This  is  the 
evacuation  zone.  You  need  to  leave.  If  you’re  outside  the  zone,  you 
take  some  adequate  precautions  that  were  discussed’’—basically, 
you  protect  your  windows,  and  you  do  some  basic  things—‘‘we  rec-
ommend  you  stay.’’  Unfortunately,  a  lot  of  those  people,  who 
haven’t been here, have never—are from an inland state, possibly— 
they  don’t  even  want  to  risk  it,  so  they  add  to  that  congestion  on 
the road. 

Senator  DEMINT.  We  also  have  mandatory  evacuations  and  that 
even—I  know  it  happened  to  me  last  year.  I  ended  up  down  here 
two  days,  and  then  I  was—at  least  the  Governor  said  I  had  to 
leave. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  DEMINT.  And  I  probably  should  have  called  and  asked 
if  that  really  applied  to  everybody,  so,  it  is  a  confusing  message. 
If  you  might  have  a  situation  where  you’re  actually  safer  staying 
if you’re outside the surge—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

But  let  me  ask  a  question  just  about  construction.  I  know  I  saw 
some  pictures  of  a  high-rise  condo  project  on  the  Gulf,  and  one  of 
the  storms  that  came  through,  that  we  would  have  assumed  that 
this  structure  could  have  withstood  it  in  any  hurricane,  yet  the 
surge, the water, worked its way under the foundation, since it was 
in a sandy foundation, and this whole thing collapsed. I mean, for-
tunately,  the  people  had  gone.  But,  as  I  look  down  the  coast  here, 
I  would  assume  that  a  storm  came  through,  all  these  large  build-
ings  would  be  okay.  Do  any  of  us  have  any  idea  if  these  are  built 
with  a  foundation  that  could  withstand  that  kind  of  undermining? 
Do we know that? 

Dr.  PREVATT.  My  sense  is  yes.  But,  with  certainty,  I  can’t  say 
that.  But  the  experience  has  been  that  engineered  structures  like 
the  high-  or  mid-rise  buildings  do,  in  fact,  perform  satisfactorily 
during  any  hurricane  that  we  have  survived.  That  one  was  cer-
tainly a unique case. 

But the idea—or the problem, should I say, with those buildings 
primarily  is  the  wall-cladding,  the  roofing  systems,  and  the  win-
dows  that  get  damaged.  Once  those  things  fail,  a  lot  of  water  and 
wind  enter  the  structures,  and  that,  in  fact,  can  cause  more  dam-
age than the—— 

Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  we  know  how  to  put  roofs  on  homes  and 
buildings  that  could  withstand,  and  we  know  how  to  develop  shat-
terproof  glass.  I  guess  the  question  is,  we’re  just  not  really  using 
them—— 

Dr. PREVATT. Because—— 
Senator DEMINT.—So we have to evacuate. 
Dr.  PREVATT.—because  we  are  not  willing  to  pay  for  it  up  front. 
We  prefer  to  wait  until  after  the  event  and  get  the  post-hurricane 
money, as opposed to the pre-hurricane retrofit. 

Senator  DEMINT.  And  I  guess  the  incentives,  as  Mr.  Dean  has 
suggested, that insurance costs do not really reflect any kind of ex-
pense  that  will  make  these  virtually  hurricane-proof.  So  I  guess  it 
is  easier  to  say,  ‘‘Well,  we’ll  just  let  the  insurance  pay  for  it.’’  But 
the economic impact of that, as well as, I think, the potential safety 
problems  of  putting  that  many  people  on  the  road,  is  enough  for 
me  to  at  least  question  if  evacuation  is  the  best  primary  strategy. 
Mr.  DEAN.  I  think,  Mr.  Chairman,  because  evacuations  are  a 
foregone  conclusion  in  so  many  situations,  that  we  really  haven’t 
incentivized  that.  Clearly,  our  collective  mothers’  advice  that  an 
ounce  of  prevention  is  worth  a  pound  of  cure  would  enable  a 
healthy  discussion  to  evaluate,  is  there  a  better  way  to  approach 
it?  I  think  the  recent  construction  on  the  Grand  Strand  has  cer-
tainly addressed some of those concerns that you’ve alluded to, but 
there  are  older  properties  that,  when  they  were  built,  we  didn’t 
know the information we have today. 

Senator DEMINT. Right. 
Mr.  DEAN.  And  I  suggest,  as  we  continue  to  grow  and  develop, 
not  only  along  the  coast  of  South  Carolina,  but  the  coast  of  the 
Southeastern  United  States,  more  and  more  of  this  information 
would  be  used,  and,  if  used  as  an  incentive  to  advantageously  ap-
proach  this,  I  think  you  would  find,  not  only  a  lot  of  support 
amongst  residents  and  businesses,  but  also  local  and  state  govern-
ment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Senator  DEMINT.  I  see,  I  guess,  some  construction  holes,  and  I 
assume  this  is  being  built  to  accommodate  a  certain  level  of  surge 
so that we assume those structures might make it through a storm. 
Well, I could keep this questioning going for a long time, because 
I think we’re kind of onto something that we need to explore a lit-
tle  more.  And  I  do  think  the  research  and  the  possible  incentives 
for  construction  alternatives  to  evacuation  and  perhaps  certain 
types of restrictions that might suggest that if you’re building med-
ical  facilities,  that  if  they  need  to  withstand  the  surge  where  they 
are, and a lot of that we could do. 

Before—I  need  to  wrap  up  pretty  quickly,  but  I  want  to  make 
sure  that  none  of  you  have  a  quick  comment  that  you  want  to 
make  based  on  other  things  that  have  been  said.  We  really  don’t 
have  time  for  another  five  minutes,  but  just  an  observation  or 
something  that  you’d  like  to  make  sure  we  carry  back.  I  mean, 
you’ve all come a long way, which I greatly appreciate. It has been, 
I think, incredibly good information to help us develop a consensus 
of some ideas. But a few comments. 

Yes, sir? 
Mr. DEAN. Mr. Chairman, again, thank you for holding this hear-
ing  here  and  for  taking  the  time  to  be  with  us.  Thank  you,  to  the 
other  panelists.  And  we  appreciate  your  interest  in  this  issue  that 
is  so  important,  not  only  to  the  Grand  Strand,  but  to  the  entire 
coast of the United States. 

I would also be remiss, Mr. Chairman, if I did not thank you and 
your  counterparts  in  the  South  Carolina  Congressional  Delegation 
for  your  efforts  to  improve  the  infrastructure.  It  has  been  touched 
on  here  today,  but  we  all  know  that  Interstate  73  will  not  only 
bring  job  growth,  it  will  eventually  save  lives.  And  though  that  is 
not  a  part  of  this  committee,  your  efforts  as  part  of  the  Environ-
ment and Public Works Committee certainly give us hope that the 
infrastructure  in  South  Carolina  will  dramatically  improve  in  the 
near future, and that ultimately will improve the safety of our resi-
dents. 

Again, we thank you for your interest in this. It’s very important 
to  the  coast  of  South  Carolina  and  other  areas,  and  we  appreciate 
your leadership in such matters. 

Senator DEMINT. Anything else? 
Mr.  CANTORE.  Mr.  Chairman,  in  1900  we  lost  approximately 
8,000  people  in  Galveston  because  we  didn’t  leave  the  beach.  Peo-
ple underestimate the power of water. It weighs 60 pounds a cubic 
foot. That’s when it’s not moving. You know, I think there are some 
great  ideas  about  getting  people  out  of  harm’s  way,  but  to  be  any-
where  close  to  a  surge  where  we  are  basically  cutting  off  people, 
masses of people and buildings, is a dangerous proposition. 

Senator  DEMINT.  I  think  that’s  a  good  thought.  It  would  be  a 
good  warning  to  have.  I  think  that  the  difference  between  water 
and wind is probably an important distinction. 

Dr.  PREVATT.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  the  research  community  is 
doing  all  it  can.  You  know,  I  have  my  vehicles  ready,  and  we  are 
ready. We’re doing the reverse evacuation in every single hurricane 
to collect the data that people will need to develop better buildings. 
More  importantly,  I  think  it  is  important  for  the  engineering  re-
searchers,  the  civics  facilities,  as  well  as  the  emergency  managers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

to  speak  to  each  other,  to  develop  the  right  mix  of  research,  build-
ing code, and policy that would provide those incentives for chang-
ing  the  way  we  build.  We  chose  to  use  plywood  instead  of  plank 
roofing.  You’re  right.  We  chose  to  build  weaker  houses.  We  can 
choose to go the other direction. 

UNIDENTIFIED PANELIST. Absolutely. 
Mr. WHITTEN. Right. 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
I  want  to  do  something—Mr.  Whitten,  you  may  want  to  say 
something, but I want to say something about you. I’d like to make 
a  little  presentation.  Mr.  Whitten,  if  you  would  come  around  here. 
One  of  the  things  we’re  doing  on  our  tour  around  the  state  dur-
ing our August break is to recognize people, organizations, and gov-
ernments,  who  are  helping  move  South  Carolina  forward.  And  the 
disaster  preparedness  here  in  Horry  County  and  the  technology 
that  has  been  used  has  been  recognized,  really,  all  over  the  coun-
try.  The  progress  that  you’re  making,  is  one  way  we  think  is  mov-
ing  South  Carolina  forward.  And  so  much  of  what  we  talk  about 
in  politics  and  in  the  news  is  often  negative  or  some  kind  of  dis-
aster  that’s  coming  through.  We  don’t  talk  enough  about  the  good 
things that are happening and the progress we’re making. 

And so, this South Carolina ‘‘On the Move Award’’ is awarded to 
Horry  County  for  the  Emergency  Preparedness  Division.  And,  Mr. 
Whitten,  I’d  like  you  to  accept  it  on  behalf  of  all  of  Horry  County. 

[Applause.] 
Senator  DEMINT.  I  appreciate  all  of  the  witnesses  who  appeared 
today. I promise you, we’ll use every bit of information you’ve given 
me.  And  it’s  certainly  a  lot  of  insight  into  what  we  need  to  do  to 
move  this  forward.  So,  I  can’t  thank  you  enough,  and,  all  of  you 
who came and sat through this, I appreciate it. 

And so, this hearing is officially over. Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 10:18 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:03 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064525 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\64525.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

